Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3320.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 1 O.S. 2021, Section 22, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 85, O.S.L. 2023 (1 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 22), is amended to read as follows:
Section 22. A. There is hereby re-created to continue until
July 1, 2026, in accordance with the Oklahoma Sunset Law, the
Oklahoma Abstractors Board. Beginning January 1, 2008, the Oklahoma
Abstractors Board shall have the total responsibility of
administering and enforcing the Oklahoma Abstractors Act.
B. The Board shall have the power and duty to prescribe,
promulgate and implement rules as deemed necessary to implement all
the provisions of the Oklahoma Abstractors Act.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 5

C. The Board shall have the power and duty to obtain and secure
an office in Oklahoma City, and employ, direct, discharge, and
define the duties and set the salaries of employees of the Board,
including an executive director, as are necessary to implement the
provisions of the Oklahoma Abstractors Act.
D. The Board shall consist of nine (9) members who shall be
appointed by the Governor and confirmed by the Senate:
1. Six of the members shall be residents of this state who are
either a holder of a current valid Certificate of Authority or an
employee of a holder of a current valid Certificate of Authority for
not less than five (5) years in a county in the district from which
the member is appointed prior to appointment. One member shall be
appointed from each of the following districts:
District 1: Alfalfa, Beaver, Blaine, Cimarron, Custer, Dewey,
Ellis, Garfield, Grant, Harper, Kingfisher, Major, Roger Mills,
Texas, Woods, and Woodward Counties.
District 2: Beckham, Caddo, Carter, Comanche, Cotton, Garvin,
Grady, Greer, Harmon, Jackson, Jefferson, Kiowa, Love, McClain,
Murray, Stephens, Tillman, and Washita Counties.
District 3: Canadian, Cleveland, Logan, and Oklahoma Counties.
District 4: Adair, Cherokee, Craig, Delaware, Kay, Mayes,
Muskogee, Noble, Nowata, Okmulgee, Osage, Ottawa, Pawnee, Payne,
Sequoyah, and Washington Counties.
District 5: Creek, Lincoln, Rogers, Tulsa, and Wagoner Counties.
District 6: Atoka, Bryan, Choctaw, Coal, Haskell, Hughes,
Johnston, Latimer, LeFlore, McIntosh, Marshall, McCurtain, Okfuskee,
Pittsburg, Pontotoc, Pottawatomie, Pushmataha, and Seminole
Counties;
2. One member shall be a resident of this state who has been a
licensed real estate broker in Oklahoma for not less than five (5)
years;
3. One member shall be an attorney who is a resident of this
state who has been licensed to practice in Oklahoma for not less
than five (5) years; and
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 6

4. One member shall be a resident of this state who has been an
officer in a bank in Oklahoma for not less than five (5) years.
E. The Governor shall make the initial appointments to the
Board within ninety (90) days of July 1, 2007:
1. The initial appointments for the members of the Board shall
be as follows:
a. members appointed from Districts 1 and 3 shall serve
until July 1, 2008,
b. members appointed from Districts 2 and 4 shall serve
until July 1, 2009,
c. members appointed from Districts 5 and 6 shall serve
until July 1, 2010,
d. the real estate broker member shall serve until July
1, 2010,
e. the attorney member shall serve until July 1, 2009,
and
f. the bank officer member shall serve until July 1,
2010; and
2. Thereafter, all members shall serve four-year terms.
F. Each member shall hold office until the expiration of the
term of office for which appointed or until a successor has been
appointed and confirmed:
1. Vacancies on the Board due to death, resignation, or removal
occurring during a term shall be filled by the Governor for the
unexpired portion of the term in a manner as provided for regular
appointments to the Board;
2. Members filling the remainder of an unexpired term shall
assume office immediately upon appointment by the Governor and shall
serve until confirmation or denial of confirmation by the Senate;
and
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 7

3. A member may be reappointed to the Board, but shall not
serve more than two consecutive terms. A member that has previously
served two consecutive terms may be reappointed after the expiration
of at least one full term.
G. Members of the Board shall receive no salary or compensation
for service on the Board, but shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses incurred on behalf of their service on the Board pursuant
to the State Travel Reimbursement Act.
H. Members may be removed from office by the Governor:
1. For inefficiency, neglect of duty, or malfeasance in office
in the manner provided for by law for the removal of officers not
subject to impeachment;
2. For cause which shall include, but not be limited to:
a. the member has ceased to be qualified. A member of
the Board is no longer qualified to serve if that
member:
(1) is a member whose Certificate of Authority,
license, or permit pursuant to the laws of this
state has become void or has been revoked or
suspended, or
(2) is a member who has moved from this state,
b. the member has been convicted, pled guilty or nolo
contendere to a felony pursuant to the laws of the
United States or any jurisdiction,
c. the member has become medically incapacitated as
determined in writing by a medical doctor upon request
by the Board, or
d. the member has been absent from three meetings, or is
absent for more than one-half (1/2) the number of
minutes for which a meeting is conducted of three
meetings as determined by the Board during any twelve-
month period, unless such absence is determined to be
unavoidable in the opinion of a majority of the
remaining members;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 8

3. Upon being found guilty, through due process, of
malfeasance, misfeasance or nonfeasance in relation to Board duties;
or
4. Upon being found mentally incompetent by a court of
competent jurisdiction.
I. Removal pursuant to the provisions of subsection H of this
section shall be accomplished in the following manner:
1. After a majority vote of the remaining members setting out
the dates of absences or other grounds for removal and the fact of
the disqualification of the member, a written notification of the
said vote shall be sent to the Governor; and
2. Upon receipt of the written notification, the Governor,
after a hearing conducted in accordance with the provisions of the
Administrative Procedures Act, may remove any member of the Board
for any of the reasons set out in the notice from the Board or for
any other reason specified in this act, provided:
a. removal pursuant to the provisions of this subsection
shall occur upon the Governor filing a written
statement of findings after the hearing as to the
reasons and basis for removal of the member with the
secretary of the Board, and
b. the Governor shall appoint another member in the
manner provided for appointments to the Board.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 3A O.S. 2021, Section 604.1, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 75, O.S.L. 2024 (3A O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 604.1), is amended to read as follows:
Section 604.1. A. There is hereby re-created, until July 1,
2027, in accordance with the Oklahoma Sunset Law, the Oklahoma State
Athletic Commission, which shall be composed of nine (9) members
appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate.
The member of the Commission initially appointed pursuant to this
act shall serve a term of three (3) years that shall expire on June
30, 2006. Members appointed to the Commission shall serve for terms
of three (3) years. Terms of office shall expire on June 30. All
vacancies and unexpired terms shall be filled in the same manner as
the original appointment and within sixty (60) days from the date of
the vacancy. Members may be removed by the Governor for
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 9

incompetence, willful neglect of duty, corruption in office, or
malfeasance in office.
B. Members appointed to the Commission shall reside in this
state and shall have the following qualifications:
1. Two members shall have experience as a professional
combative sports practitioner, other than as a professional wrestler
or in professional combative sports promotions;
2. One member shall have experience as a professional wrestler
or in professional wrestling promotions;
3. One member shall have experience in sports medicine;
4. One member shall have experience in the cable television
business; and
5. Four members shall represent the public at large as lay
members.
C. No member of the Commission or any person related to a
member within the third degree by consanguinity or affinity shall
promote, sponsor, or have any financial interest in the promotion or
sponsorship of any professional combative sports event or amateur
mixed martial arts event while a member of the Commission.
D. The members of the Commission shall elect from their
membership a chair and vice-chair to serve for one-year terms. A
majority of the members shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of
conducting the business of the Commission. The Commission shall
meet at least quarterly, and special meetings may be called by the
chair.
E. The Commission shall comply with the provisions of the
Oklahoma Open Meeting Act, the Oklahoma Open Records Act, and the
Administrative Procedures Act.
F. All members of the Commission and such employees as
determined by the Commission shall be bonded as required by Sections
85.58Q through 85.58V of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
G. Members of the Commission shall serve without compensation
but shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the performance of
their duties as provided in the State Travel Reimbursement Act.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 10

SECTION 3. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 345, O.S.L.
2025 (10 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 461), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 461. A. 1. There is hereby created, until November 1,
2028, in accordance with the Oklahoma Sunset Law, the Teacher
Recruitment and Retention Program to be administered by Oklahoma
Partnership for School Readiness under the direction of the
Department of Human Services.
2. The Department of Human Services shall promulgate rules as
necessary to implement and enforce the provisions of this section,
including verifying income eligibility, employment status, and
administering subsidy benefits accordingly.
B. The Teacher Recruitment and Retention Program, administered
through Oklahoma Partnership for School Readiness, shall ensure
that:
1. A child care employee working at a child care facility
licensed pursuant to the Oklahoma Child Care Facilities Licensing
Act shall be eligible for the Teacher Recruitment and Retention
Program, provided that:
a. total annual gross household income does not exceed
One Hundred Twenty Thousand Dollars ($120,000.00) for
a two-parent household,
b. total annual gross household income does not exceed
Sixty Thousand Dollars ($60,000.00) for a single-
parent household, or
c. children must attend a program participating in the
Department of Human Services' Child Care Subsidy
Program;
2. As used in this section, "child care employee" shall mean
any individual who is employed for a minimum of twenty (20) hours
per week, averaged monthly, who provides direct care, supervision or
educational services to children or who performs duties on-site that
support the daily operation of the facility participating in the
Child Care Subsidy Program and which is licensed pursuant to the
Oklahoma Child Care Facilities Licensing Act;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 11

3. An employee who qualifies under the household income
limitations in paragraph 1 of this subsection:
a. shall have household income exempted from
consideration solely for purposes of calculating cost-
sharing or co-payment responsibilities,
b. shall have co-payments waived if eligible under the
Department's Child Care Subsidy Program, and
c. shall be eligible to participate in the Teacher
Recruitment and Retention Program, even if his or her
income exceeds the Child Care Subsidy Program
requirements;
4. When an employee who is employed by a licensed child care
facility leaves employment of the licensed provider, the provider
shall provide written notice within thirty (30) days to the
Department of Human Services that the employee is no longer
employed; and
5. Other than the income exemption pursuant to paragraph 1 of
this subsection and the reporting requirements established pursuant
to this subsection, all other conditions of eligibility for the
Child Care Subsidy Program located in Oklahoma Administrative Code
(OAC) 340:40-7-1 shall be followed.
C. Subsection B of this section shall not apply to employees
who are employed by a child care facility licensed pursuant to the
Oklahoma Child Care Facilities Licensing Act and who are eligible
for the Child Care Subsidy Program without household income being
exempted.
D. The Department of Human Services shall waive co-payments for
employees who are employed by a licensed child care facility and who
qualify under income eligibility requirements of the Child Care
Subsidy Program.
SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 10 O.S. 2021, Section 640.1, as
last amended by Section 1, Chapter 74, O.S.L. 2024 (10 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 640.1), is amended to read as follows:
Section 640.1. A. There is hereby re-created until July 1,
2029, in accordance with the Oklahoma Sunset Law, the Oklahoma
Partnership for School Readiness Board. The Board shall promote
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 12

school readiness supporting community-based efforts to increase the
number of children who are ready to succeed by the time they enter
school. The Board shall additionally serve as the state's Early
Childhood Advisory Council and fulfill the responsibilities
described in the Head Start Act of 2007 (PL 110-134, Section 642B).
The Board shall consist of representatives from the private and
public sectors as follows:
1. Fifteen private sector representatives appointed by the
Governor to include:
a. two parents of children eight (8) years of age or
younger, and
b. one representative of licensed child care providers;
2. One representative of the licensed child care industry
appointed by the Governor;
3. One representative of a state association of federally
funded early childhood programs appointed by the Governor; and
4. To ensure that existing resources are being utilized
effectively, fifteen public sector representatives or their
designees as follows:
a. State Superintendent of Public Instruction,
b. State Commissioner of Health,
c. Commissioner of the Department of Mental Health and
Substance Abuse Services,
d. Director of the Oklahoma Department of Commerce,
e. Director of the Oklahoma Department of Libraries,
f. Director of the Department of Human Services,
g. Administrator of the Oklahoma Health Care Authority,
h. Director of the Oklahoma Commission on Children and
Youth,
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 13

i. Director of the State Department of Rehabilitation
Services,
j. Executive Director of the Oklahoma Educational
Television Authority,
k. Director of the Oklahoma Department of Career and
Technology Education,
l. Chancellor of the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education,
m. Cabinet Secretary with responsibility for education
agencies,
n. Dean of the College of Education and Human Sciences,
Oklahoma State University, and
o. State Director of Head Start Collaboration.
B. Members appointed by the Governor shall serve terms of four
(4) years; provided, of those members initially appointed to the
Board, eight members shall be appointed for two-year terms,
beginning September 1, 2003, and seven members shall be appointed
for four-year terms, beginning September 1, 2003, as designated by
the Governor. The member appointed pursuant to paragraph 2 of
subsection A of this section shall be appointed for an initial term
to end on August 31, 2007. The member appointed pursuant to
paragraph 3 of subsection A of this section shall be appointed for
an initial term to end on August 31, 2009. Appointed members shall
continue in office until a successor is appointed by the Governor.
The Governor shall fill all vacancies in the same manner as the
original appointment was made.
C. The Director of the Department of Human Services shall
convene an organizational meeting of the Oklahoma Partnership for
School Readiness Board prior to November 1, 2003, at which time
members of the Board shall elect a chair, a vice chair, and other
officers as needed. A majority of the members of the Board shall
constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.
D. Members of the Board shall receive no compensation for
serving on the Board but shall receive travel reimbursement as
follows:
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 14

1. State agency officers and employees who are members of the
Board shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in the
performance of their duties by their respective agencies in
accordance with the State Travel Reimbursement Act; and
2. Remaining members shall be reimbursed by the Board from any
funds received by the Board for travel expenses incurred in the
performance of their duties in accordance with the State Travel
Reimbursement Act.
E. Members of the Board shall be exempt from the dual-office-
holding provisions of Section 6 of Title 51 of the Oklahoma
Statutes.
SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 10 O.S. 2021, Section 1150.2, as
last amended by Section 10, Chapter 347, O.S.L. 2024 (10 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 1150.2), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1150.2. A. There is hereby re-created until July 1,
2026, in accordance with the Oklahoma Sunset Law, the Child Death
Review Board within the Oklahoma Commission on Children and Youth.
The Board shall have the power and duty to:
1. Conduct case reviews of deaths and near deaths of children
in this state;
2. Develop accurate statistical information and identification
of deaths of children due to abuse and neglect;
3. Improve the ability to provide protective services to the
surviving siblings of a child or children who die of abuse or
neglect and who may be living in a dangerous environment;
4. Improve policies, procedures and practices within the
agencies that serve children including the child protection system;
5. Enter into agreements with regional teams established by the
Board to carry out such duties and responsibilities as the Board
shall designate including assigned cases in the geographical area
for that regional team. The Commission, with the advice of the
Board, shall promulgate rules necessary for the implementation of
the provisions of this paragraph; and
6. Enter into agreements with other state, local, or private
entities as necessary to carry out the duties of the Board
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 15

including, but not limited to, conducting joint reviews with the
Domestic Violence Fatality Review Board on domestic violence cases
involving child death or child near-death incidents.
B. In carrying out its duties and responsibilities the Board
shall:
1. Establish criteria for cases involving the death or near
death of a child subject to specific, in-depth review by the Board.
As used in this section, the term "near death" means a child is in
serious or critical condition, as certified by a physician, as a
result of abuse or neglect;
2. Conduct a specific case review of those cases where the
cause of death or near death is or may be related to abuse or
neglect of a child;
3. Establish and maintain statistical information related to
the deaths and near deaths of children including, but not limited
to, demographic and medical diagnostic information;
4. Establish procedures for obtaining initial information
regarding near deaths of children from the Department of Human
Services and law enforcement agencies;
5. Review the policies and procedures of the child protection
system and make specific recommendations to the entities comprising
the system as to actions necessary for improvement;
6. Review the extent to which the state child protection system
is coordinated with foster care and adoption programs and evaluate
whether the state is efficiently discharging its child protection
responsibilities under the federal Child Abuse Prevention and
Treatment Act State Plan;
7. As necessary and appropriate, for the protection of the
siblings of a child who dies and whose siblings are deemed to be
living in a dangerous environment, refer specific cases to the
Department of Human Services or the appropriate district attorney
for further investigation;
8. Request and obtain a copy of all records and reports
pertaining to a child whose case is under review including, but not
limited to:
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 16

a. the report of the medical examiner,
b. hospital records,
c. school records,
d. court records,
e. prosecutorial records,
f. local, state, and federal law enforcement records
including, but not limited to, the Oklahoma State
Bureau of Investigation (OSBI),
g. fire department records,
h. State Department of Health records including birth
certificate records,
i. medical and dental records,
j. Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse
Services and other mental health records,
k. emergency medical service records,
l. files of the Department of Human Services, and
m. records in the possession of the Domestic Violence
Fatality Review Board when conducting a joint review
pursuant to paragraph 6 of subsection A of this
section.
Confidential information provided to the Board shall be
maintained in a confidential manner as required by state and federal
law. Any person damaged by disclosure of such information by the
Board, its regional teams or their members, not authorized by law,
may maintain an action for damages, costs and attorney fees;
9. Maintain all confidential information, documents and records
in possession of the Board as confidential and not subject to
subpoena or discovery in any civil or criminal proceedings;
provided, however, information, documents and records otherwise
available from other sources shall not be exempt from subpoena or
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 17

discovery through those sources solely because such information,
documents and records were presented to or reviewed by the Board;
10. Conduct reviews of specific cases of deaths and near deaths
of children and request the preparation of additional information
and reports as determined to be necessary by the Board including,
but not limited to, clinical summaries from treating physicians,
chronologies of contact, and second-opinion autopsies;
11. Report, if recommended by a majority vote of the Board, to
the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House
of Representatives any gross neglect of duty by any state officer or
state employee, or any problem within the child protective services
system discovered by the Board while performing its duties;
12. Recommend, when appropriate, amendment of the cause or
manner of death listed on the death certificate; and
13. Subject to the approval of the Commission, exercise all
incidental powers necessary and proper for the implementation and
administration of the Child Death Review Board Act.
C. The review and discussion of individual cases of death or
near death of a child shall be conducted in executive session and in
compliance with the confidentiality requirements of Section 1-6-102
of Title 10A of the Oklahoma Statutes. All other business shall be
conducted in accordance with the provisions of the Oklahoma Open
Meeting Act. All discussions of individual cases and any writings
produced by or created for the Board and recommended by the Board,
as the result of a review of an individual case of the death or near
death of a child, shall be privileged and shall not be admissible in
evidence in any proceeding. The Board shall periodically conduct
meetings to discuss organization and business matters and any
actions or recommendations aimed at improvement of the child
protection system which shall be subject to the Oklahoma Open
Meeting Act. Part of any meeting of the Board may be specifically
designated as a business meeting of the Board subject to the
Oklahoma Open Meeting Act.
D. 1. The Board shall submit an annual statistical report on
the incidence and causes of death and near death of children in this
state for which the Board has completed its review during the past
calendar year, including its recommendations, to the Oklahoma
Commission on Children and Youth on or before May 1 of each year.
The Board shall also prepare and make available to the public, on an
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 18

annual basis, a report containing a summary of the activities of the
Board relating to the review of deaths and near deaths of children,
the extent to which the state child protection system is coordinated
with foster care and adoption programs, and an evaluation of whether
the state is efficiently discharging its child protection
responsibilities. The report shall be completed no later than
December 31 of each year.
2. The Commission shall review the report of the Board and, as
appropriate, incorporate the findings and recommendations into the
State Plan for Services to Children and Youth.
SECTION 6. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 130.1, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 86, O.S.L. 2023 (19 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 130.1), is amended to read as follows:
Section 130.1. There is hereby re-created, to continue until
July 1, 2026, in accordance with the provisions of the Oklahoma
Sunset Law, the Commission on County Government Personnel Education
and Training, hereinafter called the "Commission". The Commission
shall be composed of the following five (5) members: The President
of Oklahoma State University or designee; the State Auditor and
Inspector or designee; the Director of the Department of
Transportation or designee; the Chairman of the Oklahoma Tax
Commission or designee; and the President of the Oklahoma County
Officers Association or designee.
SECTION 7. AMENDATORY 27A O.S. 2021, Section 2-2-201, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 69, O.S.L. 2023 (27A O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 2-2-201), is amended to read as follows:
Section 2-2-201. A. There are hereby re-created until July 1,
2026, pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Sunset Law:
1. The Water Quality Management Advisory Council;
2. The Hazardous Waste Management Advisory Council;
3. The Solid Waste Management Advisory Council; and
4. The Radiation Management Advisory Council.
B. 1. Except as provided for in paragraph 2 of this
subsection, each Council created pursuant to subsection A of this
section shall consist of nine (9) members. Three members shall be
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 19

appointed by the Governor, three members shall be appointed by the
Speaker of the House of Representatives and three members shall be
appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate. Appointments
shall be for three-year terms. Members of the Advisory Councils
shall serve at the pleasure of and may be removed from office by the
appointing authority. Members shall continue to serve until their
successors are appointed. Any vacancy shall be filled in the same
manner as the original appointments. Five members shall constitute
a quorum.
2. a. The Solid Waste Management Advisory Council shall
consist of ten (10) members. Four members shall be
appointed by the Governor, three members shall be
appointed by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives and three members shall be appointed
by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate.
Appointments shall be for three-year terms. Members
of the Solid Waste Management Advisory Council shall
serve at the pleasure of and may be removed from
office by the appointing authority. Members shall
continue to serve until their successors are
appointed. Any vacancy shall be filled in the same
manner as the original appointments. Six members
shall constitute a quorum.
b. The Water Quality Management Advisory Council shall
consist of twelve (12) members. Four members shall be
appointed by the Governor, four members shall be
appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate,
and four members shall be appointed by the Speaker of
the House of Representatives. Appointments shall be
for three-year terms. Members shall serve at the
pleasure of and may be removed by the appointing
authority. Members may be eligible for reappointment
and shall continue to serve until their successors are
appointed. Vacancies shall be filled in the same
manner as their original appointments. Seven members
shall constitute a quorum.
3. Each Council shall elect a chair and a vice-chair from among
its members. Each Council shall meet as required for rule
development, review and recommendation and for such other purposes
specified by law. Special meetings may be called by the chair or by
the concurrence of any three members.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 20

C. 1. All members of the Water Quality Management Advisory
Council shall be knowledgeable of water quality and of the
environment. The Council shall be composed as follows:
a. the Governor shall appoint four members as follows:
(1) one member representing the field of engineering,
(2) one member representing a statewide nonprofit
environmental organization,
(3) one member representing the general public, and
(4) one member representing a commercial or publicly
owned laboratory accredited by the Department for
both the Drinking Water and the General
Environmental Laboratory classifications of
accreditation,
b. the President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall appoint
four members as follows:
(1) one member representing an industry located in
this state,
(2) one member representing an oil-field-related
industry,
(3) one member representing the field of geology, and
(4) one member who holds a certificate under the
Waterworks and Wastewater Works Operator
Certification Act and who is the operator of a
municipal waterworks or wastewater works
facility, and
c. the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall
appoint four members as follows:
(1) one member representing a political subdivision
of the state who shall be a member of the local
governmental body of a city or town,
(2) one member representing a rural water district
organized pursuant to the laws of this state,
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 21

(3) one member representing the field of agriculture,
and
(4) one member who holds a certificate under the
Waterworks and Wastewater Works Operator
Certification Act and who is the operator of a
waterworks or wastewater works for a rural water
or sewer district organized pursuant to law.
2. The jurisdictional areas of the Water Quality Management
Advisory Council shall include Article VI of this chapter, Article
IV of this chapter, waterworks and wastewater activities, water
quality and protection and related activities and such other areas
as designated by the Board.
D. 1. All members of the Hazardous Waste Management Advisory
Council shall be knowledgeable of hazardous waste and of the
environment. The Council shall be composed as follows:
a. the Governor shall appoint three members as follows:
(1) one member representing an industry located in
this state,
(2) one member representing a statewide nonprofit
environmental organization, and
(3) one member representing a political subdivision
of the state who shall be a member of the local
governing body of a city or town,
b. the President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall appoint
three members as follows:
(1) one member representing a political subdivision
of the state who shall be a member of the local
governmental body of a city or town,
(2) one member representing the general public, and
(3) one member representing industry generating
hazardous waste, and
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 22

c. the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall
appoint three members as follows:
(1) one member representing the field of engineering,
(2) one member representing the hazardous waste
industry, and
(3) one member representing the field of geology.
2. The jurisdictional areas of the Hazardous Waste Management
Advisory Council shall include Article VII of this chapter, the
Oklahoma Hazardous Waste Reduction Program, and such other areas as
designated by the Board.
E. 1. All members of the Solid Waste Management Advisory
Council shall be knowledgeable of solid waste and of the
environment. The Council shall be composed as follows:
a. the Governor shall appoint four members as follows:
(1) one member representing a statewide nonprofit
environmental organization,
(2) one member shall be a county commissioner,
(3) one member representing the general public, and
(4) one member representing the solid waste
incineration, waste-to-energy industry in this
state,
b. the President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall appoint
three members as follows:
(1) one member representing an industry located in
this state generating solid waste,
(2) one member representing a political subdivision
of this state who shall be a member of the local
governmental body of a city or town, and
(3) one member representing the field of geology, and
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 23

c. the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall
appoint three members as follows:
(1) one member representing the solid waste disposal
industry in this state,
(2) one member representing the field of engineering,
and
(3) one member representing the transportation
industry.
2. The jurisdictional areas of the Solid Waste Management
Advisory Council shall include Article X of this chapter, the
Oklahoma Used Tire Recycling Act and such other areas as designated
by the Board.
F. 1. All members of the Radiation Management Advisory Council
shall be knowledgeable of radiation hazards and radiation
protection. The Council shall be composed as follows:
a. the Governor shall appoint three members as follows:
(1) one member representing an industry located in
this state which uses sources of radiation in its
manufacturing or processing business,
(2) one member representing a statewide nonprofit
environmental organization, and
(3) one member representing the engineering
profession who shall be a professional engineer
employed and experienced in matters of radiation
management and protection,
b. the President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall appoint
three members as follows:
(1) one member representing the faculty of an
institution of higher learning of university
status and shall be experienced in matters of
scientific knowledge and competent in matters of
radiation management and protection,
(2) one member representing the general public, and
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 24

(3) one member representing the field of industrial
radiography, and
c. the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall
appoint three members as follows:
(1) one member representing the transportation
industry,
(2) one member representing the petroleum industry
who is trained and experienced in radiation
management and protection, and
(3) one member representing a medical institution
within this state who shall be experienced in
matters of radiation management and protection.
2. The jurisdictional areas of the Radiation Management
Advisory Council shall include Article IX of this chapter and such
other areas as designated by the Board.
G. 1. The Air Quality Council shall remain in effect as the
Air Quality Advisory Council and carry on the powers and duties
assigned to it by law. Future appointments to the Council shall be
made according to the provisions of this section.
2. The Council shall consist of nine (9) members who shall be
residents of this state and appointed by the Governor with the
advice and consent of the Senate.
3. Members of the Council shall have the qualifications as
follows:
a. one member shall be selected from the engineering
profession, and, as such, shall be a professional
engineer and experienced in matters of air pollution
equipment and control, who shall not be an employee of
any unit of government,
b. one member shall be selected from industry in general,
and, as such, shall be employed as a manufacturing
executive carrying on a manufacturing business within
this state,
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 25

c. one member shall be selected from a faculty of an
institution of higher learning of university status
and shall be experienced in matters of scientific
knowledge and competent in matters of air pollution
control and evaluation,
d. one member shall be selected from the transportation
industry,
e. one member shall be selected from the petroleum
industry, and, as such, shall be employed by a
petroleum company carrying on a petroleum refining
business within the state, and, as such, shall be
trained and experienced in matters of scientific
knowledge of causes as well as effects of air
pollution,
f. one member shall be selected from agriculture, and, as
such, shall be engaged in or employed by a basic
agricultural business or the processing of
agricultural products,
g. one member shall be selected from the political
subdivisions of the state, and, as such, shall be a
member of the local government body of a city or town,
h. one member, whose first term shall expire on June 15,
1998, shall be selected from the general public, and
i. one member, whose first term shall expire on June 15,
1999, shall be selected from the electric utilities
industry, and as such, shall be knowledgeable in
matters of air pollution and control.
4. Each member shall be appointed to serve a term of office of
seven (7) years.
The terms of all members shall be deemed to have expired on June
15 of the year of expiration, and shall continue until successors
have been duly appointed and qualified. If a vacancy occurs, the
Governor shall appoint a person for the remaining portion of the
unexpired term created by the vacancy. Five members of the Council
shall constitute a quorum.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 26

5. The Council shall hold at least two regular meetings each
calendar year at a place and time to be fixed by the Council. The
Council shall select one of its members to serve as chair and
another of its members to serve as vice-chair at the first regular
meeting in each calendar year to serve as the chair and vice-chair
for the ensuing year. Special meetings may be called, and any
meeting may be canceled, by the chair, or by three members of the
Council by delivery of written notice to each member of the Council.
6. The jurisdictional areas of the Air Quality Council shall
include Article V of this chapter and such other areas as designated
by the Board.
H. In addition to other powers and duties assigned to each
Council pursuant to this Code, each Council shall, within its
jurisdictional area:
1. Have authority to recommend to the Board rules on behalf of
the Department. The Department shall not have standing to recommend
to the Board permanent rules or changes to such rules within the
jurisdiction of a Council which have not previously been submitted
to the appropriate Council for action;
2. Before recommending any permanent rules to the Board, give
public notice, offer opportunity for public comment and conduct a
public rulemaking hearing when required by the Administrative
Procedures Act;
3. Have the authority to make written recommendations to the
Board which have been concurred upon by at least a majority of the
membership of the Council;
4. Have the authority to provide a public forum for the
discussion of issues it considers relevant to its area of
jurisdiction, and to:
a. pass nonbinding resolutions expressing the sense of
the Council, and
b. make recommendations to the Board or Department
concerning the need and the desirability of conducting
meetings, workshops and seminars; and
5. Cooperate with each other Council, the public, the Board and
the Executive Director in order to coordinate the rules within their
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 27

respective jurisdictional areas and to achieve maximum efficiency
and effectiveness in furthering the objectives of the Department.
I. The Councils shall not recommend rules for promulgation by
the Environmental Quality Board unless all applicable requirements
of the Administrative Procedures Act have been followed, including
but not limited to notice, rule impact statement and rulemaking
hearings.
J. Members of the Councils shall serve without compensation but
may be reimbursed expenses incurred in the performance of their
duties, as provided in the State Travel Reimbursement Act. The
Councils are authorized to utilize the conference rooms of the
Department of Environmental Quality and obtain administrative
assistance from the Department, as required.
SECTION 8. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 759, as last
amended by Section 14, Chapter 330, O.S.L. 2025 (47 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 759), is amended to read as follows:
Section 759. A. There is hereby re-created, to continue until
July 1, 2026, in accordance with the provisions of the Oklahoma
Sunset Law, the Board of Tests for Alcohol and Drug Influence to be
composed of the following members beginning July 1, 2015:
1. The Dean of the Oklahoma State University College of
Osteopathic Medicine, or a designee;
2. The Dean of the University of Oklahoma College of Medicine,
or a designee;
3. The Commissioner of Public Safety, or a designee;
4. The Director of the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation,
or a designee;
5. The State Commissioner of Health, or a designee;
6. The Director of the Council on Law Enforcement Education and
Training, or a designee;
7. One certified peace officer who is a member of a local law
enforcement agency selected by the Oklahoma Sheriffs and Peace
Officers Association; and
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 28

8. One person selected by the Oklahoma Association of Chiefs of
Police.
Members shall serve without pay other than reimbursement of
necessary and actual expenses as provided in the State Travel
Reimbursement Act. Each member shall receive an appointment in
writing which shall become a permanent part of the records of the
Board. The chair and vice-chair shall be elected from the
membership of the Board every two (2) years. The Board is
authorized to appoint a State Director of Tests for Alcohol and Drug
Influence and other employees, including, but not limited to,
persons to conduct training and provide administrative assistance as
necessary for the performance of its functions, subject to available
funding and authorized full-time equivalent employee limitations.
The Board may expend appropriated funds for purposes consistent with
Sections 751 through 761 of this title and Sections 301 through 308
of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes. The Legislature shall
appropriate funds to the Department of Public Safety for the support
of the Board of Tests For Alcohol and Drug Influence and its
employees, if any. Upon the transfer of any employees from the
Alcohol Drug Countermeasures Unit of the Department of Public Safety
to the Board of Tests For Alcohol and Drug Influence on July 1,
2003, all funds of the Unit appropriated and budgeted shall be
transferred to the Board, and may be budgeted and expended to
support the functions and personnel of the Board.
B. The Board is authorized to prescribe uniform standards and
conditions for, and to approve satisfactory methods, procedures,
techniques, devices, equipment and records for, tests and analyses
and to prescribe and approve the requisite education and training
for the performance of tests or analyses of breath to determine the
breath alcohol concentration. The Board shall establish standards
for and ascertain the qualifications and competence of individuals
to administer tests and analyses of breath to determine the breath
alcohol concentration, and to issue permits to individuals which
shall be subject to suspension or revocation at the discretion of
the Board. The Board is authorized to prescribe uniform standards,
conditions, methods, procedures, techniques, devices, equipment and
records for the collection, handling, retention, storage,
preservation and delivery of specimens of blood, breath, saliva and
urine obtained for the purpose of determining the alcohol
concentration thereof or the presence or concentration of any other
intoxicating substance therein. The Board may take such other
actions as may be reasonably necessary or appropriate to effectuate
the purposes of Sections 751 through 761 of this title and Sections
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 29

301 through 308 of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and may adopt,
amend and repeal such other rules consistent with this chapter as
the Board shall determine proper. The Board is authorized to
delegate authority granted in this section to the State Director of
Tests as it deems appropriate.
C. The Board shall promulgate rules adopting uniform standards
and conditions and rules approving devices, equipment, methods,
procedures, techniques, and records for screening tests administered
for the purpose of determining the presence or concentration of
alcohol or any other intoxicating substance in a person's blood,
breath, saliva or urine. Such screening tests shall be performed in
compliance with the rules adopted by the Board of Tests for Alcohol
and Drug Influence. For purposes of this subsection, "screening
test" means the use of devices, equipment, methods, procedures,
techniques and records by law enforcement officers at roadside to
assist in the development of probable cause.
D. The Board may set rules and charge appropriate fees for
operations incidental to its required duties and responsibilities.
E. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the Board of Tests for Alcohol and Drug Influence to be
designated the "Board of Tests for Alcohol and Drug Influence
Revolving Fund". The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject
to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of monies received
pursuant to the provisions of subsection D of this section and any
funds previously deposited in the Board of Tests for Alcohol and
Drug Influence Revolving Fund. All monies accruing to the credit of
the fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by
the Board of Tests for Alcohol and Drug Influence for operating
expenses of the Board. Expenditures from the funds shall be made
upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as
prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
SECTION 9. AMENDATORY 52 O.S. 2021, Section 288.3, as
last amended by Section 1, Chapter 13, O.S.L. 2025 (52 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 288.3), is amended to read as follows:
Section 288.3. There is hereby re-created until July 1, 2031,
the Oklahoma Energy Resources Board which shall be subject to the
provisions of the Oklahoma Sunset Law. The purpose of the Board is
to coordinate a program designed to demonstrate to the general
public the importance of the Oklahoma oil and natural gas
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 30

exploration and production industry, to encourage the wise and
efficient use of energy, to promote environmentally sound production
methods and technologies, to develop existing supplies of Oklahoma's
oil and natural gas resources, to support research and educational
activities concerning the oil and natural gas exploration and
production industry and to cause remediation of historical oilfield
environmental problems.
SECTION 10. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 15.2, as
last amended by Section 1, Chapter 33, O.S.L. 2023 (59 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 15.2), is amended to read as follows:
Section 15.2. A. There is hereby re-created, to continue until
July 1, 2028, in accordance with the provisions of the Oklahoma
Sunset Law, the Oklahoma Accountancy Board. The Oklahoma
Accountancy Board shall have the responsibility for administering
and enforcing the Oklahoma Accountancy Act. The Oklahoma
Accountancy Board shall be composed of seven (7) members, who shall
have professional or practical experience in the use of accounting
services and financial matters, so as to be qualified to make
judgments about the qualifications and conduct of persons and firms
subject to regulation under the Oklahoma Accountancy Act to be
appointed by the Governor and confirmed by the Senate. The number
of registrant members shall not be more than five, not including a
firm, who shall serve terms of five (5) years. No member who has
served two successive complete terms shall be eligible for
reappointment, but an appointment to fill an unexpired term shall
not be considered a complete term for this purpose. One public
member shall serve coterminously with the Governor appointing the
public member. The other public member shall serve a term of five
(5) years.
B. Five members shall be certified public accountants holding
certificates and four shall hold permits issued pursuant to the
provisions of the Oklahoma Accountancy Act, at least four of whom
shall have been engaged in the practice of public accounting as a
certified public accountant continuously for not less than five (5)
out of the last fifteen (15) years immediately preceding their
appointments. A list of qualified persons shall be compiled and
submitted to the Governor by the Oklahoma Society of Certified
Public Accountants from time to time as appointments of the
certified public accountant Board members are required. A list of
three names shall be submitted for each single appointment from
which the Governor may make the appointment.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 31

C. Two members shall be public members who are not certified
public accountants. One public member shall be appointed by the
Governor to a term coterminous with the Governor, to serve at his or
her pleasure. The other public member shall serve a term of five
(5) years and have professional or practical experience in the use
of accounting services and financial matters. A list of qualified
persons shall be compiled and submitted to the Governor by the
Oklahoma Society of Public Accountants, Oklahoma Society of
Certified Public Accountants, or successor organizations from time
to time as appointment of the Board member is required. A list of
three (3) names shall be submitted for each single appointment from
which the Governor may make the appointment.
D. Upon the expiration of the term of office, a member shall
continue to serve until a qualified successor has been appointed.
Confirmation by the Senate is required during the next regular
session of the Senate for the member to continue to serve.
SECTION 11. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 46.4, as
last amended by Section 4, Chapter 138, O.S.L. 2024 (59 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 46.4), is amended to read as follows:
Section 46.4. There is hereby re-created, to continue until
July 1, 2026, in accordance with the provisions of the Oklahoma
Sunset Law, a board to be known as the "Board of Governors of the
Architects, Landscape Architects and Licensed Interior Designers of
Oklahoma", hereinafter referred to as the Board. The Board shall be
composed of eleven (11) members including six persons who are duly
licensed to practice architecture and are in good standing in this
state, two persons who are duly licensed to practice landscape
architecture and are in good standing in this state, two persons who
are duly licensed interior designers and who are active and in good
standing and one lay member. Each member of the Board shall be a
qualified elector of this state, and the architect, landscape
architect and licensed interior designer members shall have had five
(5) years' licensing experience as the professional position
requires in this state. Re-creation of the Board shall not alter
existing staggered terms. Board members, other than the lay member,
shall be appointed for a period of five (5) years thereafter;
provided, that nothing herein shall affect the tenure of office of
anyone who is a member of the Board on May 31, 1957. A member may
be reappointed to succeed such membership. The architect, landscape
architect or the licensed interior designer members may be appointed
by the Governor from a list of nominees submitted by respective
professional societies of this state. Membership in a professional
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 32

society shall not be a prerequisite to appointment to the Board.
The lay member of the Board shall be appointed by the Governor to a
term coterminous with that of the Governor. The lay member shall
serve at the pleasure of the Governor. Provided, the lay member may
continue to serve after the expiration of the term of the member
until such time as a successor is appointed. Vacancies which may
occur in the membership of the Board shall be filled by appointment
by the Governor. Each person who has been appointed to fill a
vacancy shall serve for the remainder of the term for which the
member the person shall succeed was appointed and until a successor,
in turn, has been appointed and shall have qualified. Each member
of the Board, before entering upon the discharge of the duties of
the member, shall make and file with the Secretary of State a
written oath or affirmation for the faithful discharge of official
duties. Each member of the Board and staff shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses pursuant to the State Travel Reimbursement Act.
SECTION 12. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 137, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 25, O.S.L. 2024 (59 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 137), is amended to read as follows:
Section 137. A. A Board of Podiatric Medical Examiners is
hereby re-created, to continue until July 1, 2027, in accordance
with the provisions of the Oklahoma Sunset Law. The Board shall
regulate the practice of podiatric medicine in this state in
accordance with the provisions of the Podiatric Medicine Practice
Act. The Board, appointed by the Governor, shall be composed of
five podiatric physicians licensed to practice podiatric medicine in
this state and one lay member representing the public.
B. Each podiatric physician member of the Board shall:
1. Be a legal resident of this state;
2. Have practiced podiatric medicine continuously in this state
during the three (3) years immediately preceding appointment to the
Board;
3. Be free of pending disciplinary action or active
investigation by the Board; and
4. Be a member in good standing of the American Podiatric
Medical Association and of the Oklahoma Podiatric Medical
Association.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 33

C. The lay member of the Board shall:
1. Be a legal resident of this state;
2. Not be a registered or licensed practitioner of any of the
healing arts or be related, within the third degree of consanguinity
or affinity, to any such person; and
3. Participate in Board proceedings only for the purposes of:
a. reviewing, investigating and disposing of written
complaints regarding the conduct of podiatric
physicians, and
b. formulating, adopting and promulgating rules pursuant
to Article I of the Administrative Procedures Act.
D. Except as provided in subsection E of this section, the term
of office of each podiatric physician member of the Board shall be
five (5) years, with one such member being appointed to the Board
each year. The lay member of the Board shall serve a term
coterminous with that of the Governor. Each member shall hold
office until the expiration of the term for which appointed or until
a qualified successor has been duly appointed. An appointment shall
be made by the Governor within ninety (90) days after the expiration
of the term of any member, or the occurrence of a vacancy on the
Board due to resignation, death, or any other cause resulting in an
unexpired term. The appointment of the podiatric physician members
shall be made from a list of not less than five persons submitted
annually to the Governor by the Oklahoma Podiatric Medical
Association.
E. Each of the three podiatric physician members of the Board,
serving on September 1, 1993, shall complete the term of office for
which he or she was appointed, and the successor to each such member
shall be appointed for a term of five (5) years. Within sixty (60)
days after September 1, 1993, the Governor shall appoint two new
podiatric physician members to the Board, one for a term expiring
July 1, 1997, and one for a term expiring on July 1, 1998. The
successor to each such new member shall be appointed for a term of
five (5) years.
F. Before assuming duties on the Board, each member shall take
and subscribe to the oath or affirmation provided in Article XV of
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 34

the Oklahoma Constitution, which oath or affirmation shall be
administered and filed as provided in such article.
G. A member may be removed from the Board by the Governor for
cause which shall include, but not be limited to:
1. Ceasing to be qualified;
2. Being found guilty by a court of competent jurisdiction of a
felony or of any offense involving moral turpitude;
3. Being found guilty, through due process, of malfeasance,
misfeasance or nonfeasance in relation to Board duties;
4. Being found mentally incompetent by a court of competent
jurisdiction;
5. Being found in violation of any provision of the Podiatric
Medicine Practice Act; or
6. Failing to attend three consecutive meetings of the Board
without just cause, as determined by the Board.
SECTION 13. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 161.4, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 1, O.S.L. 2024 (59 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 161.4), is amended to read as follows:
Section 161.4. A. A Board of Chiropractic Examiners is hereby
re-created to continue until July 1, 2026, in accordance with the
provisions of the Oklahoma Sunset Law. The Board shall regulate the
practice of chiropractic in this state in accordance with the
provisions of the Oklahoma Chiropractic Practice Act. The Board,
appointed by the Governor, shall be composed of eight chiropractic
physicians and one lay member representing the public.
B. Each chiropractic physician member of the Board shall:
1. Be a legal resident of this state;
2. Have practiced chiropractic continuously in this state
during the five (5) years immediately preceding appointment to the
Board;
3. Be free of pending disciplinary action or active
investigation by the Board;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 35

4. Be a person of recognized professional ability, integrity
and good reputation; and
5. Be in active clinical chiropractic practice at least fifty
percent (50%) of the time.
C. The lay member of the Board shall:
1. Be a legal resident of this state; and
2. Not be a registered or licensed practitioner of any of the
healing arts or be related within the third degree of consanguinity
or affinity to any such person.
D. The Governor shall appoint members to the Board and for
terms of years as follows:
1. Position 1: Upon expiration of the term of the board member
whose term expires November 2, 2006, the Governor shall appoint a
board member from District 1 for a term of four (4) years to expire
on November 1, 2010, and every four (4) years thereafter;
2. Position 2: Upon expiration of the term of the board member
whose term expires November 1, 2005, the Governor shall appoint a
board member from District 2 for a term of four (4) years to expire
on November 1, 2009, and every four (4) years thereafter;
3. Position 3: Upon expiration of the term of the board member
whose term expires June 7, 2007, the Governor shall appoint a board
member from District 3 for a term of four (4) years to expire on
June 1, 2011, and every four (4) years thereafter;
4. Position 4: Upon expiration of the term of the board member
whose term expires November 1, 2007, the Governor shall appoint a
board member from District 4 for a term of four (4) years to expire
on November 1, 2011, and every four (4) years thereafter;
5. Position 5: Upon expiration of the term of the board member
whose term expires June 7, 2008, the Governor shall appoint a board
member from District 5 for a term of four (4) years to expire on
June 1, 2012, and every four (4) years thereafter;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 36

6. Position 6: On June 1, 2005, the Governor shall appoint a
board member from District 6 for a term of one (1) year to expire on
June 1, 2006, and every four (4) years thereafter;
7. Position 7: On November 1, 2005, the Governor shall appoint
a board member from District 7 for a term of three (3) years to
expire on November 1, 2008, and every four (4) years thereafter;
8. Position 8: Upon expiration of the term of the board member
whose term expires June 7, 2005, the Governor shall appoint a board
member from the state at large for a term of four (4) years to
expire on June 1, 2009, and every four (4) years thereafter; and
9. Position 9: The lay member of the Board shall serve a term
coterminous with that of the Governor.
E. For the purpose of the Oklahoma Chiropractic Practice Act,
the state shall be divided into the following districts:
1. District 1: Alfalfa, Beaver, Beckham, Caddo, Cimarron,
Custer, Dewey, Ellis, Grant, Greer, Garfield, Harmon, Harper,
Jackson, Kiowa, Major, Noble, Roger Mills, Texas, Washita, Woods and
Woodward Counties;
2. District 2: Tulsa County;
3. District 3: Kay, Logan, Lincoln, Osage, Pawnee, Payne and
Pottawatomie Counties;
4. District 4: Carter, Comanche, Cotton, Garvin, Grady, Love,
Murray, Jefferson, Stephens and Tillman Counties;
5. District 5: Blaine, Canadian, Cleveland, Kingfisher,
McClain and Oklahoma Counties;
6. District 6: Atoka, Bryan, Coal, Choctaw, Creek, Hughes,
Johnston, Latimer, Le Flore, Marshall, McCurtain, Okfuskee,
Pittsburg, Pontotoc, Pushmataha and Seminole Counties; and
7. District 7: Adair, Cherokee, Craig, Delaware, Haskell,
Mayes, McIntosh, Muskogee, Nowata, Okmulgee, Ottawa, Rogers,
Sequoyah, Wagoner and Washington Counties.
Members appointed after June 2002 shall serve no more than two (2)
consecutive terms.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 37

F. Each member shall hold office until the expiration of the
term of office for which appointed or until a qualified successor
has been duly appointed. An appointment shall be made by the
Governor within ninety (90) days after the expiration of the term of
any member, or the occurrence of a vacancy on the Board due to
resignation, death, or any other cause resulting in an unexpired
term.
G. Before assuming duties on the Board, each member shall take
and subscribe to the oath or affirmation provided in Article XV of
the Oklahoma Constitution, which oath or affirmation shall be
administered and filed as provided in the article.
H. A member may be removed from the Board by the Governor for
cause which shall include, but not be limited to:
1. Ceasing to be qualified;
2. Being found guilty by a court of competent jurisdiction of a
felony or any offense involving moral turpitude;
3. Being found guilty, through due process, of malfeasance,
misfeasance or nonfeasance in relation to Board duties;
4. Being found mentally incompetent by a court of competent
jurisdiction;
5. Being found in violation of any provision of the Oklahoma
Chiropractic Practice Act; or
6. Failing to attend three meetings of the Board without just
cause, as determined by the Board.
I. No member of the Board shall be:
1. A registered lobbyist;
2. An officer, board member or employee of a statewide
organization established for the purpose of advocating the interests
of chiropractors licensed pursuant to the Oklahoma Chiropractic
Practice Act; or
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 38

3. An insurance claims adjuster, reviewer, or consultant;
provided, however, a person shall not be considered to be a
consultant solely for testifying in a court as an expert witness.
SECTION 14. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 199.2, as
amended by Section 2, Chapter 317, O.S.L. 2025, (59 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 199.2), is amended to read as follows:
Section 199.2. A. 1. There is hereby re-created, to continue
until July 1, 2025, in accordance with the provisions of the
Oklahoma Sunset Law, a State Board of Cosmetology and Barbering
which shall be composed of eleven (11) members to be appointed by
the Governor and to serve at the pleasure of the Governor.
2. One member shall be appointed from each congressional
district and the additional members shall be appointed at-large.
However, when congressional districts are redrawn, each member
appointed prior to July 1 of the year in which such modification
becomes effective shall complete the current term of office and
appointments made after July 1 of the year in which such
modification becomes effective shall be based on the redrawn
districts. Appointments made after July 1 of the year in which such
modification becomes effective shall be from any redrawn districts
which are not represented by a board member until such time as each
of the modified congressional districts are represented by a board
member. One member shall be a barber appointed at-large.
3. At the time of appointment, the members shall be citizens of
this state, at least twenty-five (25) years of age, and shall be
high school graduates. Six members shall, at the time of
appointment, have had at least five (5) years' continuous practical
experience in the practice of cosmetology in this state; one member
shall be appointed at-large and, at the time of the appointment,
have had at least five (5) years' continuous practical experience in
the practice of barbering in this state; one member shall be a lay
person; one member shall be an administrator of a licensed private
cosmetology school; one member shall be an administrator of a
licensed barber school; and one member shall be an administrator of
a public school licensed to teach cosmetology or barbering.
4. No two members shall be graduates of the same cosmetology
school, nor shall they be organizers of or promote the organization
of any cosmetic, beauty, or hairdressers' association. Each of the
eight cosmetology appointees shall continue to be actively engaged
in the profession of cosmetology while serving. No two members
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 39

engaged in the profession of barbering shall be organizers of or
promote the organization of any barbering association. Each of the
two barbering appointees shall continue to be actively engaged in
the profession of barbering while serving.
5. If any member retires or ceases to practice his or her
profession during the term of membership on the Board, such terms
shall automatically cease and the Governor shall appoint a like-
qualified person to fulfill the remainder of the term.
B. The terms of office for Board members shall be four (4)
years ending June 30.
C. Each member shall serve until a successor is appointed and
qualified.
D. Six members of the Board shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business.
E. The Governor may remove any member of the Board at any time
at the Governor's discretion. Vacancies shall be filled by
appointment by the Governor for the unexpired portion of the term.
F. The Board shall organize by electing from its membership a
chair and vice chair, each to serve for a period of one (1) year.
The presiding officer shall not be entitled to vote upon any
question except in the case of a tie vote.
Members shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary
traveling expenses as provided by the State Travel Reimbursement
Act.
G. Within thirty (30) days after the end of each fiscal year,
the Board shall make a full report to the Governor of all its
receipts and expenditures, and also a full statement of its work
during the year, together with such recommendations as the Board
deems expedient.
H. The Board may expend funds for suitable office space for the
transaction of its business. The Board shall adopt a common seal
for the use of the executive director in authenticating Board
documents.
I. The Board shall meet at its office for the transaction of
such business as may come before it on the second Monday in January,
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 40

March, May, July, September, and November and at such other times as
it may deem advisable.
SECTION 15. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 396, as
last amended by Section 1, Chapter 381, O.S.L. 2025 (59 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 396), is amended to read as follows:
Section 396. There is hereby re-created, to continue until July
1, 2029, in accordance with the provisions of the Oklahoma Sunset
Law, the Oklahoma Funeral Board. Any reference in the statutes to
the Oklahoma State Board of Embalmers and Funeral Directors shall be
a reference to the Oklahoma Funeral Board. The Board shall consist
of seven (7) persons, who shall be appointed by the Governor. The
term of membership of each member of the Board shall be five (5)
years from the expiration of the term of the member succeeded. Any
member having served as a member of the Board shall be eligible for
reappointment. Provided, that a member of the Board shall serve no
more than two consecutive terms and any unexpired term that a member
is appointed to shall not apply to this limit. The Governor shall
appoint the necessary members to the Board upon vacancies and
immediately prior to the expiration of the various terms. Upon
request of the Governor, appointments of a licensed embalmer and
funeral director member of the Board shall be made from a list of
five qualified persons submitted by the Oklahoma Funeral Directors
Association. An appointment to fill a vacancy shall be for the
unexpired term. A member of the Board shall serve until a successor
is appointed and qualified. No person shall be a member of the
Board, unless, at the time of appointment, the person is of good
moral character and a resident of this state. Five of the members
shall have been actively engaged in the practice of embalming and
funeral directing in this state for not less than seven (7)
consecutive years immediately prior to the appointment of the
person, shall have an active license as provided by the Funeral
Services Licensing Act, shall keep the license effective, and shall
remain a resident of this state during the entire time the person
serves on the Board. Two of the members of the Board shall be
chosen from the general public, one of whom shall, if possible, be a
person licensed and actively engaged in the health care field, and
shall not be licensed funeral directors or embalmers or have any
interest, directly or indirectly, in any funeral establishment or
any business dealing in funeral services, supplies, or equipment.
These two members shall be appointed to serve for five-year terms.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 41

SECTION 16. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 475.3, as
last amended by Section 11, Chapter 147, O.S.L. 2024 (59 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 475.3), is amended to read as follows:
Section 475.3. A. The State Board of Licensure for
Professional Engineers and Surveyors is hereby re-created, to
continue until July 1, 2026, in accordance with the provisions of
the Oklahoma Sunset Law, whose duty it shall be to administer the
provisions of Section 475.1 et seq. of this act title. The Board
shall consist of four professional engineers and two professional
surveyors, at least one of whom is not a professional engineer, all
of whom shall be appointed by the Governor, with the advice and
consent of the Oklahoma State Senate. The Governor shall also
appoint one lay member. The professional engineers and professional
surveyors shall have the qualifications required by this act.
B. Each member of the Board shall file with the Secretary of
State a written oath or affirmation for the faithful discharge of
official duties.
C. Appointments to the Board shall be in such manner and for
such period of time so that no two terms, with the exception of the
lay member, shall expire in the same year. On the expiration of the
term of any member, except the lay member, the Governor shall in the
manner herein provided appoint for a term of six (6) years a
professional engineer or professional surveyor having the
qualifications required in this act. The lay member of the Board
shall be appointed by the Governor to a term coterminous with that
of the Governor. The lay member shall serve at the pleasure of the
Governor. Provided, the lay member may continue to serve after the
expiration of the member's term until such time as a successor is
appointed. Members may be reappointed to succeed themselves. Each
member may hold office until the expiration of the term for which
appointed or until a successor has been duly appointed and has
qualified. In the event of a vacancy on the Board due to
resignation, death or for any cause resulting in an unexpired term,
if not filled within three (3) months, the Board may appoint a
provisional member to serve in the interim until the Governor acts.
SECTION 17. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 481, as
last amended by Section 1, Chapter 14, O.S.L. 2025 (59 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 481), is amended to read as follows:
Section 481. A State Board of Medical Licensure and Supervision
hereinafter referred to as the "Board", is hereby re-created, to
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 42

continue until July 1, 2030, in accordance with the provisions of
the Oklahoma Sunset Law. The Board shall be composed of seven (7)
allopathic physicians licensed to practice medicine in this state
and represent the public and four (4) lay members. The physician
members of the Board shall be graduates of legally chartered medical
schools recognized by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education or the Liaison Council on Medical Education. The
physician members shall have actively practiced as licensed
physicians continuously in this state for the three (3) years
immediately preceding their appointment to the Board. All members
of the Board shall be residents of this state and shall be appointed
by the Governor as provided for in Section 482 of this title. All
present members of the Board shall continue to serve for the
remainder of their current terms.
SECTION 18. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 582, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 252, O.S.L. 2023 (59 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 582), is amended to read as follows:
Section 582. There is hereby re-created, to continue until July
1, 2026, in accordance with the provisions of the Oklahoma Sunset
Law, the Board of Examiners in Optometry. This Board shall consist
of five (5) persons, four of whom shall possess sufficient knowledge
of theoretical and practical optics to practice optometry, be duly
licensed as optometrists, and who shall have been residents of this
state actually engaged in the practice of optometry for at least
five (5) years. The term of each licensed optometrist member of the
Board, one being appointed each year, shall be five (5) years, or
until a qualified successor is appointed. The lay member of the
Board shall serve a term coterminous with that of the Governor and
shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor. The Governor is hereby
authorized to appoint a member of the Board of Examiners in
Optometry at the expiration of any term or whenever, for any reason,
a vacancy may occur on the Board. Vacancies shall be filled for the
unexpired term only.
SECTION 19. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 698.3, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 15, O.S.L. 2025 (59 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 698.3), is amended to read as follows:
Section 698.3. A. The State Board of Veterinary Medical
Examiners is hereby re-created, to continue until July 1, 2030, in
accordance with the provisions of the Oklahoma Sunset Law, to
regulate and enforce the practice of veterinary medicine in this
state in accordance with the Oklahoma Veterinary Practice Act.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 43

B. 1. The duty of determining a person's initial and
continuing qualification and fitness for the practice of veterinary
medicine, of proceeding against the unlawful and unlicensed practice
of veterinary medicine and of enforcing the Oklahoma Veterinary
Practice Act is hereby delegated to the Board. That duty shall be
discharged in accordance with the Oklahoma Veterinary Practice Act
and other applicable statutes.
2. a. It is necessary that the powers conferred on the Board
by the Oklahoma Veterinary Practice Act be construed
to protect the health, safety and welfare of the
people of this state.
b. No member of the Board, acting in that capacity or as
a member of any Board committee, shall participate in
the making of any decision or the taking of any action
affecting such member's own personal, professional or
pecuniary interest, or that of a person related to the
member within the third degree by consanguinity,
marriage or adoption or of a business or professional
associate.
c. With advice of legal counsel, the Board shall adopt
and annually review a conflict of interest policy to
enforce the provisions of the Oklahoma Veterinary
Practice Act.
C. The practice of veterinary medicine is a privilege granted
by the people of this state acting through their elected
representatives. It is not a natural right of individuals. In the
interest of the public, and to protect the public, it is necessary
to provide laws and rules to govern the granting and subsequent use
of the privilege to practice veterinary medicine. The primary
responsibility and obligation of the Board is to protect the public
from the unprofessional, improper, incompetent and unlawful practice
of veterinary medicine.
D. The liability of any member or employee of the Board acting
within the scope of Board duties or employment shall be governed by
The Governmental Tort Claims Act.
SECTION 20. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1000.2, as
last amended by Section 121, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (59 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 1000.2), is amended to read as follows:
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 44

Section 1000.2. A. The Construction Industries Board is hereby
re-created to continue until July 1, 2026, in accordance with the
provisions of the Oklahoma Sunset Law. The Board shall regulate the
plumbing, electrical and mechanical trades, the building and
construction inspectors, the home inspectors, and the roofing
contractors through the powers and duties set forth in the
Construction Industries Board Act and in the respective licensing or
registration acts for such trades, or as otherwise provided by law.
B. 1. Beginning July 1, 2013, the Board shall be composed of
seven (7) members appointed by the Governor with the advice and
consent of the Oklahoma State Senate, as follows:
a. two members shall have at least ten (10) years'
experience in the plumbing trade, of which one shall
be a plumbing contractor and one shall be a journeyman
plumber,
b. two members shall have at least ten (10) years'
experience in the electrical trade, of which one shall
be an electrical contractor and one shall be a
journeyman electrician,
c. two members shall have at least ten (10) years'
experience in the mechanical trade, of which one shall
be a mechanical contractor and one shall be a
mechanical journeyman, and
d. one member shall have at least ten (10) years'
experience as a building and construction inspector.
2. Members shall be appointed for staggered terms of four (4)
years, as designated by the Governor. Members shall continue in
office until a successor is appointed by the Governor. The Governor
shall fill all vacancies and unexpired terms in the same manner as
the original appointment of the member whose position is to be
filled. A member may be removed by the Governor at any time.
SECTION 21. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1253, as
last amended by Section 1, Chapter 263, O.S.L. 2025 (59 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 1253), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1253. A. There is hereby re-created, to continue until
July 1, 2027, in accordance with the provisions of the Oklahoma
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 45

Sunset Law, the State Board of Licensed Social Workers, consisting
of seven (7) members.
B. Three of the members of the Board shall be licensed social
workers or licensed clinical social workers licensed pursuant to the
provisions of the Social Worker's Licensing Act. Two members shall
be licensed as either social work associates or master's social
workers. One member shall be the president of the Oklahoma Chapter
of the National Association of Social Workers. The remaining member
of the Board shall be selected from and shall represent the general
public.
C. Responsibility for enforcement of the provisions of the
Social Worker's Licensing Act is hereby vested in the State Board of
Social Work. The Board shall have all of the duties, powers, and
authority specifically granted by, or necessary for, the enforcement
of the Social Worker's Licensing Act as well as other duties,
powers, and authority it may be granted by applicable law.
D. 1. Each member of the Board appointed as a social worker
shall:
a. be a resident of this state,
b. be licensed in good standing to engage in the practice
of social work in this state,
c. at the time of appointment, have been actively engaged
in the practice of social work for at least one (1)
year out of the last five (5) years, and
d. have at least three (3) years of experience in the
practice of social work.
2. Each member of the Board appointed to represent the general
public shall be a resident of this state who has attained the age of
majority and shall not be, nor shall ever have been, a social work
licensee, or the spouse of a social work licensee, or a person who
has ever had any material financial interest in the provision of
social work services or has engaged in any activity directly related
to the practice of social work.
SECTION 22. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1354, as
last amended by Section 1, Chapter 265, O.S.L. 2025 (59 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 1354), is amended to read as follows:
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 46

Section 1354. There is hereby re-created, to continue until
July 1, 2028, pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Sunset Law,
the State Board of Examiners of Psychologists. The Board shall
administer the provisions of the Psychologists Licensing Act. The
Board shall consist of seven (7) members appointed by the Governor.
Five members shall be psychologists from various areas in psychology
and two members shall be lay persons. At the expiration of the term
of each Board member who is a psychologist, the Governor shall
appoint a successor from a list of ten licensed psychologists which
is provided by the Oklahoma Psychological Association. Members
shall serve for a term of four (4) years and until a successor is
appointed and qualified. Before entering upon the duties of office,
each member of the Board shall take the constitutional oath of
office and file it with the Secretary of State.
SECTION 23. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1455, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 87, O.S.L. 2023 (59 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 1455), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1455. A. There is hereby re-created, to continue until
July 1, 2026, in accordance with the provisions of the Oklahoma
Sunset Law, the Polygraph Examiners Board.
B. 1. The persons serving on the Board on June 30, 1988, shall
continue to serve the full terms for which they were originally
appointed until their successors have been duly appointed and
approved with the advice and consent of the Senate. All future
Boards shall continue the staggered terms of office established for
the Polygraph Examiners Board prior to July 1, 1988.
2. Any actions taken by any state agency on behalf of the
Polygraph Examiners Board or in an attempt to enforce the provisions
of the Polygraph Examiners Act shall be subject to review by the
Board. Any such acts may be rescinded or modified as deemed
appropriate by the Board, provided that such action shall not affect
any accrued right, or penalty incurred, or proceeding begun between
July 1, 1988, and October 12, 1988.
3. All funds collected after June 30, 1988, equipment, files,
fixtures, furniture, and supplies of the Board which were
transferred to the Office of Management and Enterprise Services or
State Treasury pursuant to Section 3909 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma
Statutes shall be returned to the care and custody of the Board.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 47

4. All orders, determinations, rules, regulations, permits,
certificates, licenses, contracts, rates, and privileges which have
been issued, made, granted, or allowed by the Board and are in
effect on June 30, 1988, shall continue in effect according to their
terms until further action is taken by the Board or as modified by
law.
C. The Board shall consist of five (5) members who shall be
citizens of the United States and residents of the state for at
least two (2) years prior to appointment, all of whom shall have
been engaged for a period of two (2) consecutive years as polygraph
examiners prior to appointment to the Board, and at the time of
appointment active polygraph examiners. No two Board members may be
employed by the same person or agency. No more than two members may
be appointed from one congressional district. However, when
congressional districts are redrawn, each member appointed prior to
July 1 of the year in which such modification becomes effective
shall complete the current term of office and appointments made
after July 1 of the year in which such modification becomes
effective shall be based on the redrawn districts. No appointments
may be made after July 1 of the year in which such modification
becomes effective if such appointment would result in more than two
members serving from the same modified district. At least two
members must be qualified examiners of a governmental law
enforcement agency and at least two members must be qualified
polygraph examiners in the commercial field. The members shall be
appointed by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma, with the advice
and consent of the Senate, for terms of six (6) years. Any vacancy
in an unexpired term shall be filled by appointment of the Governor,
with the advice and consent of the Senate, for the unexpired term.
Except as authorized by the Polygraph Examiners Act, members of the
Board shall be paid no fee, expense reimbursement, wage or other
compensation for their services.
D. The vote of a majority of the Board members is sufficient
for passage of any business or proposal which comes before the
Board. The Board shall elect a chair, vice-chair, and secretary
from among its members.
SECTION 24. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1607, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 26, O.S.L. 2024 (59 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 1607), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1607. A. There is hereby re-created, to continue until
July 1, 2027, in accordance with the provisions of the Oklahoma
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 48

Sunset Law, the Board of Examiners for Speech-Language Pathology and
Audiology whose duty it is to administer the provisions of the
Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology Licensing Act. The members
of the Board shall be residents of this state and shall be appointed
by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate. The
Board shall be composed of five (5) members consisting of three
licensed speech-language pathologists or audiologists, provided that
at least one of the three shall be a licensed speech-language
pathologist and at least one, a licensed audiologist; one
otolaryngologist who is certified by the American Board of
Otolaryngology and one lay member.
B. The members of the original Board shall serve the following
terms: one member for one (1) year, two members for two (2) years,
and two members for three (3) years. Thereafter, at the expiration
of the term, or termination of the member's service for any reason,
the Governor shall appoint each successor for a term of three (3)
years, or for the remainder of an unexpired term. The successor for
any of the three speech-language pathologists or audiologists will
be selected from a list of five licensed speech-language
pathologists or audiologists, furnished by the Oklahoma Speech-
Language-Hearing Association. The re-creation of the Board shall
not affect the staggered terms of office for Board members
established with the original Board.
C. Before entering upon the duties of the member's office, each
member of the Board shall take the constitutional oath of office and
file it with the Secretary of State.
D. Board members may be reappointed to serve one additional
three-year term. Three (3) years after the termination of a
previous appointment to the Board, a member may be reappointed for
one additional three-year term.
E. Board members shall be reimbursed for travel expenses
incurred in the performance of their duties as provided in the State
Travel Reimbursement Act.
SECTION 25. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1873, as
last amended by Section 1, Chapter 266, O.S.L. 2025 (59 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 1873), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1873. A. There is hereby re-created, to continue until
July 1, 2028, in accordance with the provisions of the Oklahoma
Sunset Law, the Oklahoma Board of Licensed Alcohol and Drug
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 49

Counselors, consisting of seven (7) members, to be appointed by the
Governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate, as follows:
1. a. Six members who shall be alcohol and drug counselors
certified by an entity recognized to do professional
alcohol and drug counseling certification in this
state; provided, however, five of such members shall
subsequently secure licensure and one such member
shall subsequently secure certification, pursuant to
the provisions of the Licensed Alcohol and Drug
Counselors Act, no later than January 1, 2005.
b. Thereafter, five members shall be licensed alcohol and
drug counselors at the time of appointment, and one
member shall be certified as an alcohol and drug
counselor at the time of appointment.
c. Pursuant to the provisions of this paragraph, the
Governor shall appoint:
(1) four members from a list of names submitted by
the Oklahoma Drug and Alcohol Professional
Counselor Association,
(2) one member from a list of names submitted by the
Oklahoma Substance Abuse Services Alliance, and
(3) one member from a list of names submitted by the
Oklahoma Citizen Advocates for Recovery and
Transformation Association.
d. One member shall be appointed from and shall represent
the general public. Such member shall be a resident
of this state who has attained the age of majority and
shall not be, nor shall ever have been, a licensed or
certified alcohol and drug counselor, or the spouse of
a licensed or certified alcohol and drug counselor, or
a person who has ever had any material financial
interest in the provision of alcohol and drug
counseling services or has engaged in any activity
directly related to the practice of alcohol and drug
counseling.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 50

2. The composition of the Board shall include five members who
hold a master's or higher degree and one member whose highest degree
held is a bachelor's degree.
3. The Governor shall appoint the members to the Board no later
than July 1, 2004.
B. Each member of the Board appointed as a licensed alcohol and
drug counselor shall:
1. Be certified or licensed to engage in the practice of
alcohol and drug counseling in this state and shall be in good
standing; and
2. Have at least three (3) years of experience in the practice
of alcohol and drug counseling in this state.
C. Two of the members initially appointed shall serve three-
year terms; two shall serve four-year terms; and three shall serve
five-year terms, as designated by the Governor. Thereafter, the
terms of all members shall be five (5) years.
D. A vacancy on the Board shall be filled in the same manner as
the original appointment for the balance of the unexpired term.
Members may succeed themselves but shall serve no more than two
consecutive terms. Each member shall serve until a successor is
appointed and qualified.
E. Members of the Board may be removed from office for one or
more of the following reasons:
1. The refusal or inability for any reason to perform the
duties of a Board member in an efficient, responsible and
professional manner;
2. The misuse of office for pecuniary or material gain or for
personal advantage for self or another;
3. A violation of the laws or rules governing the practice of
alcohol and drug counseling; or
4. Conviction of a felony as verified by a certified copy of
the record of the court of conviction.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 51

F. Members of the Board shall serve without compensation, but
shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary travel expenses as
provided in the State Travel Reimbursement Act.
SECTION 26. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 2053, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 76, O.S.L. 2024 (59 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 2053), is amended to read as follows:
Section 2053. A. There is hereby re-created until July 1,
2027, in accordance with the provisions of the Oklahoma Sunset Law,
the State Board of Examiners of Perfusionists. The Board shall
administer the provisions of the Oklahoma Licensed Perfusionists
Act. The Board shall consist of nine (9) members, appointed by the
State Board of Medical Licensure and Supervision.
B. The initial appointments for each member shall be for
progressive terms of one (1) through three (3) years so that only
one term expires each calendar year; subsequent appointments shall
be for five-year terms. Members of the Board shall serve at the
pleasure of and may be removed from office by the appointing
authority. No member shall serve more than three consecutive terms.
Members shall continue to serve until their successors are
appointed. Any vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as the
original appointments. Five members shall constitute a quorum.
C. The Board shall be composed as follows:
1. Three members shall be members of the general public;
2. Four members shall be licensed perfusionists appointed from
a list of not less than ten licensed perfusionists submitted by a
statewide organization representing licensed perfusionists; and
3. Two members shall be physicians licensed pursuant to the
Oklahoma Allopathic Medical and Surgical Licensure and Supervision
Act and who are also board certified in cardiovascular surgery.
D. The licensed perfusionist members shall have been engaged in
rendering perfusion services to the public, teaching perfusion care,
or research in perfusion care, for at least five (5) years
immediately preceding their appointments. These members shall at
all times be holders of valid licenses for the practice of perfusion
in this state, except for the members first appointed to the Board.
These initial members shall, at the time of appointment, be
credentialed as a Certified Clinical Perfusionist (CCP) conferred by
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 52

the American Board of Cardiovascular Perfusion (ABCP) or its
successor organization, and all shall fulfill the requirements for
licensure pursuant to the Oklahoma Licensed Perfusionists Act. All
members of the Board shall be residents of this state.
E. Upon expiration or vacancy of the term of a member, the
respective nominating authority may, as appropriate, submit to the
appointing authority a list of not less than three persons qualified
to serve on the Board to fill the expired term of their respective
member. Appointments may be made from these lists by the appointing
authority and additional lists may be provided by the respective
organizations if requested by the appointing authority.
F. It shall be a ground for removal from the Board if a member:
1. Does not have at the time of appointment the qualifications
required for appointment to the Board;
2. Does not maintain during service on the Board the
qualifications required for appointment to the Board;
3. Violates a prohibition established pursuant to the Oklahoma
Licensed Perfusionists Act;
4. Cannot discharge the member's term for a substantial part of
the term for which the member is appointed because of illness or
disability; or
5. Is absent from more than half of the regularly scheduled
board meetings that the member is eligible to attend during a
calendar year unless the absence is excused by a majority vote of
the Board.
SECTION 27. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 6001, as
last amended by Section 1, Chapter 89, O.S.L. 2023 (59 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 6001), is amended to read as follows:
Section 6001. A. 1. There is hereby re-created the State
Board of Behavioral Health Licensure to continue until July 1, 2025,
in accordance with the provisions of the Oklahoma Sunset Law.
2. Members of the Board shall serve at the pleasure of and may
be removed from office by the appointing authority. Members shall
continue to serve until their successors are appointed. Any vacancy
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 53

shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments.
Four members shall constitute a quorum.
3. The Board shall meet at least twice a year, but no more than
four (4) times a year and shall elect a chair and a vice-chair from
among its members. The Board shall only meet as required for:
a. election of officers,
b. establishment of meeting dates and times,
c. rule development,
d. review and recommendation, and
e. adoption of nonbinding resolutions to the Board
concerning matters brought before the Board.
4. Special meetings may be called by the chair or by
concurrence of any three members.
B. 1. All members of the Board shall be knowledgeable of
counseling issues. The Board shall be appointed by the Governor
with the advice and consent of the Senate:
a. four members who are licensed professional counselors,
b. three members who are licensed family and marital
therapists,
c. two members who are licensed behavioral practitioners,
and
d. two members representing the public and possessing
knowledge of counseling issues.
2. Members of the Board shall serve for a period of three (3)
years and may be removed at any time by the appointing authority.
Vacancies on the Board shall be filled by the appointing authority.
A majority of the Board shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business.
3. The members of the Board from each professional area of
behavioral health counseling shall comprise separate committees and
shall consult on professional issues within their respective areas
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 54

of behavioral health counseling. Each committee shall recommend to
the Board approval or disapproval of all licenses to be issued
within its specialty. Each committee shall be authorized to
recommend approval or disapproval of the examination requirements
for all applicants for licensure in the respective area of
behavioral health counseling, provide grading standards for
examinations, and provide for other matters relating to licensure in
that area of behavioral health counseling. Each committee may
create advisory committees to consult on professional duties and
responsibilities pursuant to the provisions of this section.
4. Any and all recommendations, approvals, or disapprovals made
by a committee pursuant to the provisions of this section shall not
become effective without the approval of a majority of members of
the Board.
5. The jurisdictional areas of the Board shall include
professional counseling licensing and practice issues, marital and
family therapist licensing and practice issues, behavioral
practitioner licensing and practice issues and such other areas as
authorized by the Licensed Professional Counselors Act.
C. The Board shall not recommend rules for promulgation unless
all applicable requirements of the Administrative Procedures Act
have been followed including but not limited to notice, rule impact
statements and rule-making hearings.
D. Members of the Board shall serve without compensation but
may be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the performance of their
duties, as provided in the State Travel Reimbursement Act. The
Board is authorized to utilize the conference rooms of and obtain
administrative assistance from the State Board of Medical Licensure
and Supervision as required.
E. The Board is authorized and empowered to:
1. Establish and maintain a system of licensure and
certification pursuant to the provisions of the Licensed
Professional Counselors Act;
2. Adopt and enforce standards governing the professional
conduct of persons licensed pursuant to the provisions of the
Licensed Professional Counselors Act;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 55

3. Lease office space for the purpose of operating and
maintaining a state office, and pay rent thereon; provided, however,
such state office shall not be located in or directly adjacent to
the office of any person licensed pursuant to the provisions of the
Licensed Professional Counselors Act;
4. Purchase office furniture, equipment, and supplies;
5. Employ such office personnel as may be necessary, and fix
and pay their salaries or wages;
6. Contract with state agencies for the purposes of
investigating written complaints regarding the conduct of persons
licensed pursuant to the provisions of the Licensed Professional
Counselors Act and obtaining administrative assistance as deemed
necessary by the Executive Director; and
7. Make such other expenditures as may be necessary in the
performance of its duties.
F. The Board shall employ an Executive Director. The Executive
Director shall be authorized to:
1. Employ and maintain an office staff;
2. Enter into contracts on behalf of the Board; and
3. Perform other duties on behalf of the Board as needed or
directed.
G. All employees and positions shall be placed in unclassified
status, exempt from the provisions of the Oklahoma Personnel Act.
SECTION 28. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 1-1923, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 197, O.S.L. 2023 (63 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 1-1923), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1-1923. A. There is hereby re-created, to continue
until July 1, 2025, in accordance with the provisions of the
Oklahoma Sunset Law, a Long-Term Care Facility Advisory Council
which shall be composed as follows:
1. The Governor shall appoint a thirteen-member Long-Term Care
Facility Advisory Council which shall advise the State Commissioner
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 56

of Health. The Advisory Council shall be comprised of the following
persons:
a. one representative from the Oklahoma Health Care
Authority, designated by the Administrator,
b. one representative from the Department of Mental
Health and Substance Abuse Services, designated by the
Commissioner of Mental Health and Substance Abuse
Services,
c. one representative from the Department of Human
Services, designated by the Director of Human
Services,
d. one member who shall be a licensed general
practitioner of the medical or osteopathic profession,
e. one member who shall be a registered pharmacist,
f. one member who shall be a licensed registered nurse or
licensed practical nurse,
g. one member who shall be an operator-administrator of a
nursing home which has a current license issued
pursuant to the Nursing Home Care Act and who shall
have had five (5) years' experience in the nursing
home profession as an operator-administrator,
h. one member who shall be an operator-administrator of a
residential care home licensed pursuant to the
provisions of the Residential Care Act,
i. one member who shall be an owner-operator of an adult
day care facility licensed pursuant to the provisions
of the Adult Day Care Act,
j. one member who shall be an owner-operator of a
continuum of care facility or assisted living center
licensed pursuant to the provisions of the Continuum
of Care and Assisted Living Act,
k. two members who shall be over the age of sixty-five
(65) who shall represent the general public and have
no long-term care professional work history, and
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 57

l. one member who shall be over the age of sixty-five
(65) who shall represent the general public and who
advocates for individuals receiving long-term care
services; and
2. Appointments shall be for two-year terms. Members shall
serve at the pleasure of their designators. Members may be
reappointed not to exceed two terms. In case of a vacancy, the
Governor shall appoint individuals to fill the remainder of the
term.
B. The State Department of Health shall provide administrative
support to perform designated duties of the Advisory Council. The
Department shall also provide space for meetings of the Advisory
Council.
C. The Advisory Council shall annually elect a chair, vice-
chair and secretary-treasurer, shall meet at least quarterly, and
may hold such special meetings as may be necessary. The members of
the Advisory Council shall be reimbursed as provided for by the
State Travel Reimbursement Act.
D. The Advisory Council shall have the power and duty to:
1. Serve as an advisory body to the Department for the
development and improvement of services to and care and treatment of
residents of facilities subject to the provisions of the Nursing
Home Care Act, homes subject to the provisions of the Residential
Care Act and facilities subject to the provisions of the Adult Day
Care Act;
2. Review and make recommendations regarding quality of
services, care, and treatment provided to individuals receiving
services from entities that are subject to the Nursing Home Care
Act, the Residential Care Act and the Adult Day Care Act; and
3. Evaluate and review the standards, practices, and procedures
regarding the administration and enforcement of the provisions of
the Nursing Home Care Act, the Residential Care Act and the Adult
Day Care Act.
SECTION 29. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 91, as last
amended by Section 1, Chapter 264, O.S.L. 2025 (63 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 91), is amended to read as follows:
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 58

Section 91. A. There is hereby re-created, to continue until
July 1, 2030, in accordance with the provisions of the Oklahoma
Sunset Law, an oversight board to be known as the State Anatomical
Board, to be composed of the following members:
1. The deans or their designee of each accredited medical
school and osteopathic medical school within this state;
2. The persons heading the department of anatomy, or comparable
department, in the medical and osteopathic medical schools or their
designee;
3. Two persons appointed jointly by the presidents of
institutions of higher education within the state which have
educational programs other than medical which require on a regular
basis human anatomical materials, provided that these programs have
been approved by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education;
and
4. One at-large member appointed by the Governor to represent
the interests of the citizens of this state.
B. It shall be the duty of the State Anatomical Board to
register all anatomical donor programs and non-transplant tissue
banks and to designate agents to provide for the collection,
preservation, storage, distribution, delivery, recovery from users,
cremation and final disposition of all dead human bodies used for
health science education and research in this state.
C. The Board shall elect from its membership a chair who shall
perform such other duties as the Board may prescribe by rule. The
Board shall have full power to establish rules for its government,
to appoint and remove officers, and to appoint an executive director
who shall keep full and complete minutes of its transactions and
manage the affairs of the Board. The expenditures authorized in
this section shall not be a charge against the state, but shall be
paid by the agent designated by the Board to receive, store, issue,
and cremate human anatomical materials. Records shall also be kept
by the agent of all bodies received and distributed for the period
of time authorized by the Records Disposition Schedule. The name of
the oversight board shall be the State Anatomical Board, hereinafter
called the Anatomical Board. The Anatomical Board may, in its
discretion, exempt any county, district, or institution from the
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 59

provisions of Sections 91 through 100 of this title in any calendar
year for any length of time.
SECTION 30. AMENDATORY 67 O.S. 2021, Section 305, as
last amended by Section 1, Chapter 217, O.S.L. 2025 (67 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 305), is amended to read as follows:
Section 305. There is hereby re-created until July 1, 2028, in
accordance with the Oklahoma Sunset Law, the Archives and Records
Commission, hereinafter referred to as the Commission, to be
composed of one member to be appointed by the Governor who shall
serve as Chairman, the State Librarian as Vice Chairman and
Secretary, the Lieutenant Governor, the State Auditor and Inspector
and the State Treasurer as members. Any member may appoint and
designate a subofficer or employee as his or her proxy for purposes
of carrying on the duties of the Commission. The Commission shall
have sole, entire and exclusive authority of the disposition for all
public records and archives of state officers, departments, boards,
commissions, agencies and institutions of this state. The authority
herein granted shall not apply to records and archives of political
subdivisions of the state; provided, however, Section 305 et seq. of
this title shall not apply to the confidential records and files of
the Oklahoma Tax Commission which are exempt from all provisions of
this act.
SECTION 31. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3-173, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 306, O.S.L. 2023 (70 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 3-173), is amended to read as follows:
Section 3-173. A. There is hereby re-created to continue until
July 1, 2026, in accordance with the provisions of the Oklahoma
Sunset Law, the Oklahoma Advisory Council on Indian Education.
B. The Council shall:
1. Make recommendations to the State Board of Education and the
Superintendent of Public Instruction in educational matters
affecting the education of Native American students;
2. Promote educational opportunities and improvement of the
quality of education provided to Native American students throughout
the state;
3. Advocate for Native American students in the state; and
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 60

4. Monitor and evaluate how the public education system of the
state impacts Native American students.
C. The Council shall be composed of eighteen (18) members as
follows:
1. Five members who shall each represent an Indian tribe in the
state, of which at least one shall represent an Indian tribe which
has an enrollment of less than ten thousand (10,000) members who
reside in the state, appointed by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives from a list of nominations submitted by the elected
executive leaders of different Indian tribes in the state;
2. Four members who shall each represent the tribal education
departments of an Indian tribe in the state, appointed by the
President Pro Tempore of the Senate from a list of nominations
submitted by the elected executive leaders of different Indian
tribes in the state;
3. One member who shall represent the Oklahoma Council for
Indian Education, appointed by the Governor;
4. Two members who shall represent two different statewide
organizations representing public school teachers, appointed by the
President Pro Tempore of the Senate;
5. One member who shall represent a statewide organization
representing public school superintendents, appointed by the Speaker
of the House of Representatives;
6. One member who shall represent Oklahoma tribal colleges,
appointed by the Chancellor of Higher Education;
7. The Director of the Native American Cultural and Educational
Authority, or designee;
8. The Chancellor of Higher Education, or designee;
9. The Director of the Oklahoma Department of Career and
Technology Education, or designee; and
10. The Superintendent of Public Instruction, or designee.
D. Appointments to the Council shall be made by September 1,
2023. The first meeting of the Council shall be called by the
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 61

Superintendent of Public Instruction. At the first meeting, the
members of the Council shall elect a chair and vice chair from among
the members. Meetings of the Council shall be held at least
quarterly at the call of the chair. Members shall serve at the
pleasure of their appointing authorities. A majority of the members
of the Council shall constitute a quorum to transact business, but
no vacancy shall impair the right of the remaining members to
exercise all of the powers of the Council. A vacancy on the Council
shall be filled by the original appointing authority. A vacancy on
the Council in a seat representing an Indian tribe in the state or
the tribal education department of an Indian tribe in the state may
be filled by the original appointing authority from a list of
nominations submitted by the elected executive leaders of Indian
tribes in the state. Appointments to fill any vacancy on the
Council shall be made within three (3) months following the vacancy.
The State Department of Education, Oklahoma Department of Career and
Technology Education, and the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education shall provide staff, support, and information as requested
by the Council.
E. Members of the Council shall receive no compensation for
serving on the Council but shall receive travel reimbursement as
follows:
1. State employees who are members of the Council shall be
reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in the performance of their
duties by their respective agencies in accordance with the State
Travel Reimbursement Act; and
2. All other members of the Council shall be reimbursed by the
Office of Management and Enterprise Services for travel expenses
incurred in the performance of their duties in accordance with the
State Travel Reimbursement Act.
F. The Council shall act in accordance with the provisions of
the Oklahoma Open Meeting Act and the Oklahoma Open Records Act.
G. Members who serve on the Council shall be exempt from the
dual-office-holding prohibitions of Section 6 of Title 51 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
H. The Council shall have the following duties:
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 62

1. Identify strategies for developing an efficient and reliable
process of communications between Oklahoma education entities,
educators, tribal organizations, and other interested parties;
2. Identify and disseminate research-based, measurable
criteria, both behavioral and academic, by which the success and
efficacy of the education offered to Native American students in
Oklahoma may be measured;
3. Analyze data to ensure that education agencies in Oklahoma
continue to address the education needs of Native American students;
4. Encourage and promote Native American educational leadership
at all levels of the education system; and
5. Make recommendations to the State Board of Education for
programs that will help achieve the purposes of the Oklahoma
Advisory Council on Indian Education Act.
I. The Council shall evaluate and make an annual report on the
effectiveness of the public education system in Oklahoma in meeting
the needs of Native American students in Oklahoma. The report shall
be submitted to the State Board of Education. The report shall also
contain a summary of the findings made by the Council pursuant to
subsection H of this section, a summary of all data collected by the
Council, a summary of the means by which all data was collected by
the Council, and any other information deemed necessary by the
Council.
SECTION 32. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 23-105, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 296, O.S.L. 2023 (70 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 23-105), is amended to read as follows:
Section 23-105. There is hereby re-created, to continue until
July 1, 2026, in accordance with the provisions of the Oklahoma
Sunset Law, Section 3901 et seq. of Title 74 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, a body corporate and politic to be known as the "Oklahoma
Educational Television Authority", and by that name the Authority
may sue and be sued, and plead and be impleaded. The Authority is
hereby constituted an instrumentality of the state, and the exercise
by the Authority of the powers conferred by this article for the
planning, construction, operation, and maintenance of educational
television facilities shall be deemed and held to be an essential
function of the state.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 63

The Oklahoma Educational Television Authority shall consist of
thirteen (13) members, including the President of the University of
Oklahoma, the President of Oklahoma State University, the State
Superintendent of Public Instruction, the Chancellor of the Oklahoma
State Regents for Higher Education, the president of one of the
state-supported four-year colleges to be chosen by the presidents of
this group of institutions, the president of one of the state-
supported two-year colleges to be chosen by the presidents of this
group of institutions, and seven additional members to be appointed
by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate, to serve
seven-year terms.
The appointed members shall have been residents of the state for
at least five (5) years preceding the date of their appointment.
The appointed members shall include one member from each of the
congressional districts and any remaining members shall be appointed
from the state at large. However, when congressional districts are
redrawn each member appointed prior to July 1 of the year in which
such modification becomes effective shall complete the current term
of office and appointments made after July 1 of the year in which
such modification becomes effective shall be based on the redrawn
districts. Appointments made after July 1 of the year in which such
modification becomes effective shall be from any redrawn districts
which are not represented by an authority member until such time as
each of the modified congressional districts are represented by an
authority member. A majority of the appointed members shall be
actively engaged in the profession of education. Each appointed
member of the Authority, before entering upon the duties of the
member, shall take the oath provided for by Section 1 of Article XV
of the Constitution of the State of Oklahoma.
The seven original members appointed by the Governor shall
continue in office for terms expiring on June 30, 1954; June 30,
1955; June 30, 1956; June 30, 1957; June 30, 1958; June 30, 1959;
and June 30, 1960, respectively. The terms of each of the original
appointed members shall be designated by the Governor, and said
members shall serve for their appointed terms and until their
respective successors shall be appointed and qualified. The
successor of each appointed member shall be appointed for a term of
seven (7) years, except that any person appointed to fill a vacancy
shall be appointed to serve only for the unexpired term in said
vacancy.
The Authority shall elect from the membership of the Authority a
chair, a vice-chair, and a secretary-treasurer. Any such officers
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 64

elected by the Authority on or after July 1, 1984, shall be
appointed to serve a term of one (1) year. Seven members of the
Authority shall constitute a quorum, and the vote of seven members
shall be necessary for any action taken by the Authority. No
vacancy in the membership of the Authority shall impair the right of
a quorum to exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of
the Authority. The Authority shall meet at least quarterly.
The members of the Authority shall not be entitled to
compensation for their services, but each member shall be reimbursed
for travel expenses incurred in performing official duties in
accordance with the provisions of the State Travel Reimbursement
Act. No liability or obligation shall be incurred by the Authority
beyond the extent to which monies shall have been provided pursuant
to the authority of this article.
SECTION 33. AMENDATORY 73 O.S. 2021, Section 83.1, as
last amended by Section 1, Chapter 16, O.S.L. 2025 (73 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 83.1), is amended to read as follows:
Section 83.1. A. There is hereby re-created to continue until
July 1, 2030, in accordance with the Oklahoma Sunset Law, a Capitol-
Medical Center Improvement and Zoning Commission to exercise the
functions and perform the duties hereinafter prescribed.
B. The Commission shall be composed of eleven (11) members as
follows:
1. The Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services or his or her designee, who shall be ex officio chair of
the Capitol-Medical Center Improvement and Zoning Commission;
2. The Director of the Transportation Commission or his or her
designee;
3. The President of the University of Oklahoma or his or her
designee;
4. Two members appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the
Senate;
5. Two members appointed by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 65

6. The Chair of the Planning Commission of Oklahoma City or his
or her designee;
7. The Chair of the Long-Range Capital Planning Commission or
his or her designee; and
8. Two members of the Commission appointed by the Governor,
with the advice and consent of the State Senate, for four-year
staggered terms with one term expiring on January 31 of each even-
numbered year.
C. The Commission is authorized to appoint and hire a Director,
who shall serve as the chief administrative officer of the
Commission, and other necessary personnel. The Attorney General of
the State of Oklahoma shall be the legal advisor to the Commission
in the same capacity as he or she is to other boards and
commissions.
D. At least one of the members appointed by the President Pro
Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of
Representatives shall be a resident within the boundaries of the
Capitol-Medical Center Improvement and Zoning District as set forth
in Section 83 of this title.
SECTION 34. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 245, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 92, O.S.L. 2023 (74 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 245), is amended to read as follows:
Section 245. A. The Climate Office of the State of Oklahoma
located at Norman, Oklahoma, shall be under the direction and
supervision of the Board of Regents of the University of Oklahoma
and shall be known as the Oklahoma Climatological Survey. The
Oklahoma Climatological Survey is hereby re-created, to continue
until July 1, 2026, in accordance with the provisions of the
Oklahoma Sunset Law.
B. The director of the Oklahoma Climatological Survey shall be
appointed by the Board and shall either serve as the state
climatologist or appoint another current employee of the Survey to
serve as state climatologist. The salary of the director shall be
determined by the Board.
C. The Oklahoma Climatological Survey shall have for its object
and duties the following:
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 66

1. To acquire, archive, process and disseminate, in the most
cost-effective way possible, all climate and weather information
which is or could be of value to policy and decision makers in the
state;
2. To act as the representative of the state in all
climatological and meteorological matters both within and outside
the state when requested to do so by the legislative or executive
branches of the state government;
3. To prepare, publish and disseminate periodic regular climate
summaries for those individuals, agencies and organizations whose
activities are related to the welfare of the state and are affected
by climate and weather;
4. To conduct and report on studies of climate and weather
phenomena of significant socioeconomic importance to the state;
5. To evaluate the significance of natural and man-made,
deliberate and inadvertent changes or modifications in important
features of the climate and weather affecting the state, and to
report this information to those agencies and organizations in the
state who are likely to be affected by such changes or
modifications; and
6. To maintain and operate the Oklahoma Mesonetwork, a
statewide environmental monitoring network which is overseen by the
Mesonet Steering Committee, comprised of representatives of the
University of Oklahoma and Oklahoma State University according to
its Memorandum of Agreement. The director of the Oklahoma
Climatological Survey shall be accountable for executing the
policies of the Mesonet Steering Committee.
D. The director is authorized to certify copies as being
authentic reproductions of weather records held in the state.
E. The director of the Oklahoma Climatological Survey shall
present a report each year to the Board of Regents of the University
of Oklahoma showing the progress, condition and all other
information which the Board may deem necessary.
SECTION 35. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 7005, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 70, O.S.L. 2023 (74 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 7005), is amended to read as follows:
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 67

Section 7005. A. The Oversight Committee for State Employee
Charitable Contributions shall be composed of the Director of the
Office of Management and Enterprise Services, or designee, and six
(6) state employees, of which two shall be appointed by the
Governor, two shall be appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the
Oklahoma State Senate and two shall be appointed by the Speaker of
the Oklahoma House of Representatives. Members shall serve at the
pleasure of their appointing authorities. The provisions of Section
6 of Title 51 of the Oklahoma Statutes shall not apply to
appointments to the Committee. The Committee is re-created to
continue until July 1, 2028, in accordance with the provisions of
the Oklahoma Sunset Law.
B. The Committee annually shall elect a chair from its
membership. The Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services shall serve as chair until the first such election.
C. The Oversight Committee for State Employee Charitable
Contributions shall have the following duties and responsibilities:
1. Arrange for publication of information about the application
process;
2. Review applications of federations electing to participate
in the State Charitable Campaign and certify that a federation and
each of its member agencies meet the eligibility criteria set forth
in Sections 7009 and 7010 of this title;
3. Notify in writing each of the applying federations of its
acceptance or rejection. Provided, if a federation is rejected, the
Committee shall provide the reason for rejection of each of the
member agencies of the federation;
4. Hear appeals of rejected agencies;
5. Delegate to the principal combined fundraising organization
the primary responsibility for the staffing and the financial
obligations necessary to comply with the provisions of this
subsection;
6. Develop a pledge card to be used throughout the State
Charitable Campaign;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 68

7. Select a principal combined fundraising organization to
assist the Committee in gathering and accumulating the applications;
and
8. Promulgate rules to implement the provisions of the Oklahoma
State Employee Charitable Contribution Act.
D. The Office of Management and Enterprise Services shall
provide such staff support as is required by the Committee.
E. The Oversight Committee for State Employee Charitable
Contributions is authorized to appoint such advisory councils and
task forces as it deems necessary for counsel, advice, and review
concerning the formulation and administration of the rules,
application review process, and the implementation of the Oklahoma
State Employee Charitable Contribution Act.
SECTION 36. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 3901, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 3901. This act Sections 3901 through 3921 of this title
shall be known as the "Oklahoma Sunset Law."
SECTION 37. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 3902, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 3902. As used in the Oklahoma Sunset Law:
1. "Statutory entity" means any department, agency, commission,
board or other regulatory instrumentality of state government
enumerated in the Oklahoma Sunset Law; and
2. "Termination date" means the date provided for termination
of legislative authority for the existence of a particular entity as
provided for in this act.
SECTION 38. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 3909, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 3909. A. Except as otherwise provided by law, any
statutory entity listed in Sections 3903 through 3908 of this title
which is terminated by the Legislature in accordance with the
Oklahoma Sunset Law shall have a period of one (1) year after its
termination date for the purpose of ceasing its affairs and
termination shall not reduce or otherwise limit the powers, duties,
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 69

or functions of said entity. Upon the expiration of the one-year
period, the entity and its personnel positions shall be abolished.
B. Except as otherwise provided by law, one (1) year after the
termination date of a statutory entity, the State Treasurer shall
transfer all funds of that entity to the General Revenue Fund. All
debts of that entity shall be paid by the State Treasurer from the
funds of that statutory entity. All equipment, files, fixtures,
furniture, and supplies of the terminated entity shall be
transferred to the Office of Management and Enterprise Services to
be stored or disposed of as specified by law. Any other outstanding
obligations or functions remaining to be performed after termination
of an entity shall be performed by the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services until provisions are made for such obligations
or functions by the Legislature.
SECTION 39. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 3913, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 3913. A. All orders, determinations, rules,
regulations, permits, certificates, licenses, contracts, rates and
privileges which have been issued, made, granted or allowed to
become effective by a statutory entity abolished by the Legislature
pursuant to this act or by any provision of law affected by this
act, shall continue in effect according to their terms until
terminated or modified by operation of law.
B. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this act any revenue
bonds heretofore or hereafter issued or sold by a statutory entity
shall remain in full force and effect, and no such statutory entity
shall be terminated under the terms of this act until such
outstanding revenue bonded indebtedness has been satisfied.
C. No suit, action or other judicial proceeding lawfully
commenced by or against any officer or agency in his or its official
capacity, or in relation to the exercise of his or its official
functions, shall abate by reason of the taking effect of any
provision of this act, but the court, unless it determines that the
survival of such suit, action or other proceedings is not necessary
for purposes of settlement of the questions involved, shall allow
the same to be maintained, with such substitutions as to parties as
are appropriate.
D. No administrative action or any judicial proceeding lawfully
commenced shall abate solely by reason of the taking effect of any
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 70

provision of this act. Any such cause of action pending on the date
the entity is terminated or that is commenced during the termination
period shall be prosecuted or defended in the name of the state by
the Attorney General if it would have been his duty to so prosecute
or defend had the statutory entity been recreated.
SECTION 40. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 3914, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 3914. A. The Legislature may, at any time, notify a
statutory entity that it is being placed under sunset review.
B. When any statutory entities are under review for sunset,
said entities shall bear the burden of establishing that a
sufficient public need is present which justifies their continued
existence. All said entities shall provide the appropriate House
and Senate sunset committees with the following information:
1. A performance-informed operating budget review and analysis,
including a summary of all income and expenditures;
2. The identity of all units and subunits under the direct or
advisory control of the statutory entity under review;
3. All powers, duties and functions currently performed by the
statutory entity under review;
4. All statutory or other authority under which said powers,
duties and functions of the statutory entity are carried out;
5. Any powers, duties or functions which, in the opinion of the
statutory entity under review, are being performed and duplicated by
another statutory entity within the state including the manner in
which, and the extent to which, this duplication of efforts is
occurring and any recommendations as to eliminating such a
situation;
6. Any powers, duties or functions which, in the opinion of the
statutory entity under review, are inconsistent with current and
projected public demands and should be terminated or altered; and
7. Any other information which the appropriate House or Senate
sunset committee, in its discretion, feels is necessary and proper
in carrying out its duties.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 71

C. After review of a statutory entity, the Legislature may set
a termination date for the entity for one (1) year after the date of
the review decision along with required adjustments for continued
operation of the entity. If a statutory entity does not implement
the required adjustments by the termination date, the statutory
entity shall be terminated and shall cease affairs in accordance
with Section 3909 of this title.
SECTION 41. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 3917, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 3917. A. Any statutory entity enumerated in the
Oklahoma Sunset Law shall, if re-created, be placed in this act to
be terminated or re-created not more than six (6) years thereafter.
B. The Oklahoma Department of Libraries shall monitor actions
of the State Legislature and maintain a list of all agencies,
boards, commissions, committees or other entities created or
authorized by law, and all entities created by a Governor's
Executive Order. The updated list shall be provided to the
Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma State Senate,
the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of Representatives, and the chairs
of the appropriate House or Senate sunset committee within thirty
(30) days after sine die adjournment of each legislative session.
SECTION 42. REPEALER 2 O.S. 2021, Section 18-34, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 43. REPEALER 2 O.S. 2021, Section 18-181, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 44. REPEALER 10 O.S. 2021, Section 1430.4, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 45. REPEALER 11 O.S. 2021, Section 51-104, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 46. REPEALER 47 O.S. 2021, Section 759, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 47. REPEALER 52 O.S. 2021, Section 420.22, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 48. REPEALER 53 O.S. 2021, Section 231, is
hereby repealed.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 72

SECTION 49. REPEALER 56 O.S. 2021, Section 162.1b, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 50. REPEALER 57 O.S. 2021, Section 521.1, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 51. REPEALER 57 O.S. 2021, Section 549.2, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 52. REPEALER 59 O.S. 2021, Section 46.4, as last
amended by Section 2, Chapter 147, O.S.L. 2024 (59 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 46.4), is hereby repealed.
SECTION 53. REPEALER 59 O.S. 2021, Section 481, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 227, O.S.L. 2024 (59 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 481), is hereby repealed.
SECTION 54. REPEALER 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1000.2, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 55. REPEALER 62 O.S. 2021, Section 34.56, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 56. REPEALER 63 O.S. 2021, Section 330.52, as
amended by Section 4, Chapter 271, O.S.L. 2023 (63 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 330.52), is hereby repealed.
SECTION 57. REPEALER 70 O.S. 2021, Section 6-129.1, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 58. REPEALER 72 O.S. 2021, Section 241, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 59. REPEALER 74 O.S. 2021, Section 18p-2, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 60. REPEALER 74 O.S. 2021, Section 5060.40, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 61. REPEALER 74 O.S. 2021, Sections 3903, 3904,
3905, 3906, 3907, and 3908 are hereby repealed.
SECTION 62. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 73

declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 74

Passed the House of Representatives the 12th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 29th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 3320 Page 75